Title
Review for World Is Not Enough, The (1999)
Number of Reviews
32

Author
Nick Lyons
  I have generally been a fan of the James Bond series, and I am always
anticipating a new installment. While Pierce Brosnan is a good Bond, his films,
with the exception of Goldeneye, have suffered greatly from storylines and even
some action sequences.
  In the 19th episode, Bond is sent to protect Elektra King, who's in charge of
an oil company (Sophie Marceau) from the evil madman Renard (Robert Carlyle),
who has a bullet driven into his head, giving him the power to feel no pain. Of
course what is a Bond film without twists and turns, none of which I will
reveal, for your viewing pleasure.
  This film disappoints on so many levels, that I could spend all day
discussing them, but I'll keep it relatively short. First off, the film is
actually quite dull. I thought I'd never see the day, when a Bond film never
delivers an explosive ride. Sure there are some nice highlights. The
Underground Pipe scene, the boat chase at the beginning, but nothing ever
sticks out. In Goldneye there was the tank scene, in Tomorrow Never Dies the
remote controlled car, this one merely follows the formula and never gives us a
treat. Even the ending is pathetic. How many times must a Bond film involve a
submarine! It's time to think of something more elaborate, hint hint, be
creative next time.
  Another element that bugged me, was Robert Carlyle. I was expecting a great
performance, especially when the character has a bullet in his head, and can
feel no pain. I was really hoping they would have expanded on that, but that
never occurred. The Bond girls however were decent. Despite the rumors you've
heard about Denise Richard's acting ability, it wasn't as bad as I thought.
Considering the little amount of screen time she had, there was no way of
telling what she could have done, but hey, she looks real nice. Isn't that what
Bond girls are about anyway? I mean, it's not like she's in the running for an
Oscar. Sophie Marceau however was of value to the film, but she received far
too much attention. The film could have easily been shortened, if it wasn't for
the writer's obsession with her character.
  Luckily, those Bond moments fans all cherish are still here and of course
some new features, that might be of some interest as well. Of course there is
the hero himself, Pierce Brosnan, who continues to do an exceptional job as
Bond. I do hope that he will reconsider, and do another entry, this time, a
more thoughtful entertaining one! Then there's the gadgets. Too be honest, the
vehicles are the main factor in this film and there are very few gadgets. The
BMW, although considered a gadget, looked nice, but you can pretty much guess
what happens to that, and every other vehicle Bond enters. The "fishing boat"
as Q refers to, is also pretty shabby, as it's powered by booster jets.
Speaking of Q, he is now training John Cleese (the latest expert) to replace
himself, for when he retires. When Q does go, it will be a shame to see him
leave. I doubt the series will ever be the same without the help of Q's
priceless one-liners, but Cleese (best known for his work in Monty Python) is a
rather noble replacement. At least it's someone you can rely on to make you
laugh.
  While "The World Is Not Enough" is far from the best in the series, there are
some fast paced scenes, that will keep you strapped to your chair. The familiar
elements are still here, but fans will be undoubtebly displeased.

Author
Steve Kong
I'll admit up front that I've only become a big fan of the James Bond films 
after I saw GoldenEye.  I've seen one or two Sean Connery Bond films, one 
Moore, and all of the Dalton ones.  Strangely, it was Dalton's Bond that 
truly introduced me to the Bond franchise.  But, it was Brosnan's Bond that 
got me hooked.  Dalton's Bond was, well, terrible.  Brosnan is the better 
Bond.  And to stir some controversy, I think that Brosnan is a better Bond 
than Connery, I think that Brosnan is the best Bond of all.
So, it is to no surprise that I loved The World is Not Enough.  It's a 
Don't Miss film, packed with action, intrigue, and well, everything that 
we've come to expect from a Bond film:  "Bond, James Bond", "Shaken, not 
stirred", M, Q, beautiful women with funny names, and heaps of sexual 
innuendo.  Brosnan's Bond films have revitalized the Bond franchise.   With 
each film getting better, The World is Not Enough is the best of the three 
Brosnan Bond films.
The storyline is convoluted and in the tradition of Bond storylines, it 
needs a lot of suspension of disbelief.  I must say though, the story was a 
little more fleshed out than other Bond films, especially the 
characterizations.  More on that later.  An oil tycoon is killed and Bond 
is asked by M (Judi Dench) to protect his daughter, Electra King (Sophie 
Marceau), because she may well be the next victim.  The terrorist that 
killed Electra's father is a man named Renard (Robert Carlyle), who lives 
after having a bullet lodged into his brain by another MI6 agent.  The 
bullet is killing Renard slowly, but with everyday it is lodged in his 
brain, he becomes stronger - don't see Bond films for medical class.  It 
seems that Renard has bigger plans than just killing Electra.  Somehow, in 
this entire story a physicist, Dr. Christmas Jones (Denise Richards), gets 
sucked into being Bond's sidekick.  (Yes, I know what you're saying, 
"Denise Richards?  A physicist?"  Yes, it's true.)  So, Bond must save the 
world from Renard and someone else, which you'll find out in the film, but 
it's not too hard to figure out.  There are other little sub-plots in the 
film and they are, though light in treatment, well written.  There is also 
an introduction of a new character to the franchise, R (John Cleese), which 
seems to be Q's (Desmond Llelewyn) replacement.
If you've seen the last two Brosnan Bond outings and liked them, you'll 
absolutely love The World is Not Enough.  There are enough explosions, 
gunfire, and chases to make your heart glow.  The film opens, like all Bond 
films, with a well-executed action sequence.  The one in The World is Not 
Enough is an extended sequence that starts in an office goes to boats in 
the Thames and ends in a hot air balloon.  Quite a rousing start to the 
film with the action gets better from there.
Brosnan is cast perfectly as Bond.  He has just enough of a sly boyish 
charm to fill the shoes of Bond.  Yet he has a detached front to all of 
it.  This time around, Brosnan has gotten the role down pat, maybe gotten 
it down just a little too well.  At times Brosnan seems to be bored with 
the role and looks as if he's just going through the motions.  At other 
times though, Brosnan seems to be going all out with the role - look at the 
scene with Brosnan and the sunglasses in the casino.  He's mixed in this 
outing, but he's still the best Bond in my mind.
Carlyle is cast as the villain in this film, but he is only half the 
badness of the film.  And, well, he's not the memorable half of the 
badness.  Known mostly, in America at least, for his part in The Full 
Monty, Carlyle's part feels padded.  His part is wholly forgettable and 
underwritten.  He also doesn't have enough menace in him to be scary on 
screen, at least not enough to be a good villain.  Carlyle does what he can 
with his role.
Marceau is the standout performer of the film.  She gives such depth to her 
Bond-girl role that the role can't even be called so.  She is classy in the 
role, giving it a full and rich performance that will be remembered for a 
while - and that is saying a lot since, as you may remember, this is a Bond 
film!  Kudos to Marceau for putting such great effort into her character.
And, well, finally there's Denise Richards.  She can't act worth a lick and 
I think the only reason she's in the film is so that she can run around in 
tight t-shirts, tight shorts, and tight pants - getting the box-office grab 
from the male audience.  Oh, and not to forget, she also gets a scene in a 
wet white t-shirt.  Yes, Richards is the true Bond-girl of The World is Not 
Enough.  She fills the role OK.  She really can't act, but she does seem to 
be putting in a good effort and it looks like she's having fun with the 
role.  Her role is fairly thin and her lines are even worse.  But, I guess 
she's there for eye candy and she works well as so.
The film is directed by Michael Apted, who is better known for his 
documentaries (7 Up series) and non-action films (Nell).  Apted does just 
fine as the director of this film.  Putting together some finely crafted 
action sequences that get the adrenaline pumping.  I loved the opening 
sequence, the skiing sequence, and the caviar sequence.  They are all well 
done.  Apted is a notch better at action direction than Tomorrow Never Dies 
director Roger Spottiswoode.  The cinematographer, Adrian Biddle (Aliens, 
Thema and Louise), works well with Apted and the film is strikingly 
beautiful.  Maybe for Bond 20 the producers can sign John Woo into for the 
director's chair and see how much better the action can be.  The three 
Brosnan Bond films have been directed by directors not really known for 
directing action (Martin Campbell, Roger Spottiswoode, and Michael 
Apted).  I'd love to see what kind of Bond film would come out of it being 
directed by a director strictly known for his action work.
What needs to be noticed in this film is the score by David Arnold 
(Stargate, Independence Day, Tomorrow Never Dies).  Eric Serra scored the 
first Brosnan Bond film, GoldenEye.  Serra took the stance that John 
Barry's Bond theme was old, worn out, and, well, wouldn't work for the new 
Bond films.  Serra's generic score for GoldenEye didn't do the film 
justice.  Serra dead wrong about Barry's Bond theme.  Arnold proved Serra 
wrong with his score to Tomorrow Never Dies, weaving Barry's Bond theme 
into an original score, making the score reminiscent of Bond without 
copying Barry outright.  Arnold's score for Tomorrow Never Dies took me 
aback.  The day before the release of The World is Not Enough, I bought 
Arnold's score for the film.  Arnold has outdone his Tomorrow Never Dies 
score with his The World is Not Enough score.  This score is wholly 
original, yet it draws enough from Barry's Bond theme that it seems quite 
familiar.  The Bond feeling is back in the score and it works really well 
with the film.  Kudos to Arnold for putting together a wonderful score.
Bottom line?  Don't Miss The World is Not Enough.  This is the best Bond 
film to date.

Author
Tim Chandler
Directed by: Michael Apted
Written by: Bruce Feirstein, Michael France, Neal Purvis, Dana Stevens,
Robert Wade
Starring: Pierce Brosnan, Sophie Marceau, Denise Richards, Robert
Carlyle, Judi Dench, Robbie Coltrane
Produced by: Barbara Broccoli, Michael G. Wilson
James Bond is back in yet another mission to save the world from evil.
    There aren't many film series that make it past the third sequel or
so. And of the handful that come to mind (Police Academy, Hallowe'en,
Friday The 13th), only James Bond has managed to stay interesting and
successful. While the other series suffer from a lack of star power,
repetitive situational comedy or poor efforts, Bond has never failed.
The lead actor switches help; when Roger Moore's run was starting to
sag, even Timothy Dalton's presence helped, though not for long. A
strong reliance on testosterone-fuelled explosions and sex has given the
series a large set of fans which shows no sign of abandoning ship. The
only problem with Bond is the fact that this, the 19th film in the
series, suffers from an obvious lack of originality. Basically,
everything has been done. Boat scenes? Check. Ski scenes? Check. Outer
space scenes? Check. You name it and Bond has done it. This gives The
World Is Not Enough a been there, done that feel, and makes for a
forgettable cinematic experience.
    Does this sound familiar? A bald, facially-scarred villain wants to
re-shape the globe using a nuclear weapon. It should, because not only
did classic Bond baddie Ernst Bloefeld try this, so did Dr. Evil from
the Bond-parody Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery. With
nothing new left to try, director Michael Apted is forced to take Bond's
adventures from the past, and make them better; he does not succeed.
    The story, involving a nuclear bomb, some oil pipelines, and several
beautiful women is as pointless as it is poorly written. The point of
Bond is to remind us once again that he is "the gentleman spy" and that
he can get out of any situation. Yet there is a sense of desperation
about the film, as if the pantheon of writers involved in the project
were worried that there wasn't enough "Bond-ness" to go around. So
instead of a ski chase where he is pursued by other skiers, he is chased
by ultra-cool para-choppers. Instead of a thrilling boat chase, we get a
thrilling boat chase followed by a short trip through city streets and
cafes, where in the real world he would kill easily five to ten people
with his actions. Instead of simply being debonair with the ladies, he
beds not one, not two, but three of them, including Denise Richards, who
is 27 to Brosnan's 46. Some of the action sequences are undeniably
interesting, but it has all been done.
    The acting is what you would expect from a Bond film. Sophie Marceau
does a better job as Elektra than she did previously opposite David
Spade in Lost & Found, though this does not say much. Marceau has a
monotone way of speaking that gets irritating after a short while, and
does not fit the part very well. As Dr. Christmas Jones, Richards plays
a nuclear physicist (the concept of which is laughable) and you just
know her unorthodox name garners a few lame jokes in the film. Richards
is a dreadful actress in my opinion and (I never thought I would say
this of anyone in a Bond film) her lack of acting ability hampers the
film greatly. Brosnan is in usual form, as are Judi Dench and Desmond
Llewelyn in their returning roles as M and Q (John Cleese makes a cameo
as R). Robbie Coltrane is amusing a Russian caviar gangster, while
Robert Carlyle (of Ravenous and The Full Monty) joins a long list of
over the top Bond villains as Renard, a terrorist who has a bullet
lodged in his brain with gives him super-strength and pain tolerance.
    About the only things that impressed me about this film were the
opening credits sequence and the music. After the traditional shot of
Bond centred in a gunman's sights, the title appears and we are treated
to an appealing mosaic of flowing oil droplets which form female
silhouettes while a song by rock band Garbage plays. While in no way
revolutionary, the special effects display is intriguing and one of the
few things about the film that didn't remind me of something else. The
score by David Arnold takes the classic Bond theme song and gives it an
electronica-laced overhaul, giving several scenes a musical boost.
    The bottom line with this film is simple; if you are a devoted Bond
fan, go see the film, you will probably like it. If you have hated every
Bond film you have ever seen, then do not go see this one, it is more of
the same. This is an old series which is in need of another boost
(luckily Pierce Brosnan has declared this his final Bond, opening the
door to another new face and some new ideas). One can hope that that
boost will come soon, before Bond starts to sink, the way Batman did
after his first film.
The Bottom Line front page - Max'd On Movies - The O.F.C.S.

Author
Steve Rhodes
Some movies shoot for the moon.  Others wallow in the dirt.  Bond films,
on the other hand, have modest, simple aspirations.  They are happy just
to provide solid entertainment value.  And by that metric, THE WORLD IS
NOT ENOUGH, directed by 42 UP's Michael Apted, does exactly what it sets
out to do.  Pierce Brosnan in his best film yet as James Bond, proves
once again that he's the best Bond since Sean Connery.
The most important costars in the Bond movies are the spy's toys.  These
films usually have the audience applauding for the stunts, and this
episode of the superspy saga is no different.
The best of the bunch in THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH is a sleek, one-man,
black boat complete with jet afterburners, which looks like something
custom-made for Batman.  The vehicle even has the ability to dive
underwater briefly while the driver holds his breath.  It can turn into
a car as well, all the better to engage in a typical Bond demolition
derby.
The plot, not that it's important, involves competing oil pipelines and
stolen plutonium.  "If there's the slightest chance, Bond will succeed,"
his boss, M (Judi Dench), reassures us.  The outcome of a Bond movie is
never in question, but who cares?  That's not why we're here.  We come
to have fun and enjoy the action, like the helicopter with a supersized
chainsaw attached, which cuts through cars and buildings.
Elektra King (Sophie Marceau) is a recently kidnapped daughter of a
wealthy oil magnate who's building a large oil pipeline in competition
with 3 other Russian ones.  Sophie Marceau, who possesses the eternal
beauty of a lush oil painting, has a knack, as she showed in FIRELIGHT,
for appearing hopelessly vulnerable while being anything but.  Bond
films always feature beautiful women, and the two this time are among
the best of the Bond babes.
Besides Marceau, the sexually charged Denise Richards (WILD THINGS)
plays Dr. Christmas Jones, a nuclear physicist with explosive good
looks.  First seen in a tight fitting tank top and brief shorts, she
makes science look pretty exciting.  Under Apted's direction, both of
the women hold their own against the world's best spy.  King is
deceptively alluring, and Jones is young and cocky.  "You want to put
that into English for those of us who don't speak spy?" Jones mocks Bond
at one point.
After an injury, Bond seduces M5's female doctor in order to be declared
fit for service.  "He has remarkable stamina," her report concludes.
The movie is rife with such double-entendres, which delight the older
members of the audience while going right over the heads of the younger.
In a cameo John Cleese plays R, the replacement that Q's been training.
R goes over all of the bells, whistles and guns in Bond's latest
spymobile.  This one, R tells him, even has 6 cup holders.
The funny script by Bruce Feirstein, Neal Purvis, and Robert Wade is
filled with puns and clever little jokes.  "I see you put your money
where your mouth is," Bond ridicules a slimy, hired gunman with a mouth
full of shiny, gold teeth.
Bond movies don't really have messages.  They're happy just to amuse us,
which this one does in spades with its great stunts, funny dialog and
crisp acting.  On the other hand, if we want to go looking for a
message, Bond himself says it best.  Stunningly handsome, lying in bed
next to the equally beautiful King, he tells her, "I take pleasure in
great beauty."  Now that's something with which viewers of either sex
can identify.
THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH runs 2:08.  It is rated PG-13 for intense
sequences of action violence, some sexuality and innuendo and would be
acceptable for kids around 10 or 11 and up.
My son Jeffrey, age 10, who has seen all but 2 of the Bond films, loved
this one, giving it ****.  He especially liked the battles and the
boat/sub/car.  His friends, ages 10 and 11, with him mentioned the same
things, and had similar ratings -- Steven ****, Nickolas ****, John ***
1/2 and Alan ***.  Alan and John complained that there was too much
sleeping around.  (There is no sex or nudity in the film, and the women
are strategically covered by the bedcovers.)
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
John Sylva
James Bond 007: The World Is Not Enough by John Sylva    Rating: B-
As the movies come and go, some bad, some horrible, some wonderful, it's good
to know that you can be reassured that there is still one character you can
always count on to bring you first rate entertainment in his films.  Bond. 
James Bond.  In "The World is Not Enough", Pierce Brosnan's third outing as the
007 agent, you can expect to see the usual Bond formula put to use, and you can
expect to hear the same lines, feel the same emotions, and see the same type of
villain wanting to cause mass destruction.  Michael Apted takes the director's
chair in this 19th Bond film which is a slight improvement over 1997's
"Tomorrow Never Dies", but doesn't reach the cleverness of Brosnan's debut as
Bond in 1995's "Goldeneye".
In this chapter of the ongoing Bond series, the slick 007 agent is in charge of
looking after Elektra King (Sophie Marceau), an oil heiress who is believed to
be in grave danger due to the mad terrorist Renard (Robert Carlyle).  The
challenge of protecting Elektra won't be as easy as many of Bond's missions,
for Renard has a bullet lodged in his head, making it impossible for his senses
to function, resulting in the fact that he feels no pain.  Along the mission,
Bond meets up with nuclear weapons expert Dr. Christmas Jones (Denise Richards)
and sets off to rescue Elektra in this exhilarating story of action and
inventive stunts.
Once again, Pierce Brosnan sets a new standard for himself with his performance
here.  Brosnan is fluently impressive, adding the extra charm and smoothness to
his character needed to play Bond.  The majority of the film it is hard to tell
how well Brosnan is actually acting though, as he is constantly either outshone
or under shone by his co-stars.
The talent above Brosnan being one of the "Bond girls," Sophie Marceau, and the
talent below being the other "Bond girl," Denise Richards.  Sophie Marceau is
surprisingly clever here as her seemingly (hint, hint) innocent, harmless
character, tricking you into her false emotions scene after scene.  Her
performance is the most memorable, devilishly clever performance of a Bond girl
in all of Pierce Brosnan's turns as 007.  On the other hand, we have Denise
Richards.  Where to begin?  Richards shows much promise in last summer's
hilarious laugh riot Drop Dead Gorgeous and 1998's Wild Things.  Where did she
go wrong?  To make it 100% clear, Richards couldn't sell her lines if she was
being held at gunpoint, her life depending on giving an adequate performance. 
The lines the screenplay gives her are bad enough- "Jones.  Christmas Jones. 
And don't make any jokes, I've heard them all."- but did she really have to
utter those lines without an ounce of feeling or sincerity?  Girls in James
Bond movies are historical for their poor acting skills, but Richards certainly
sets a new low.  When she's on screen with Brosnan, who doesn't particularly
dazzle here either, she makes him look like an acting legend, and yes, she's
that bad.  Although bad she may be, the Bond series isn't known for good acting
or good plots, so Richards fits into the series just as well as most of the
Bond girls that have acted as badly in the past as she does here.
"The World is Not Enough" is your basic Bond, with a bigger budget and a louder
soundtrack, both of which help make this installment a worthwhile venture. 
I've seen the majority of the Bond films to date, and not once have I witnessed
one that was ever boring or non entertaining.  This nineteenth installment runs
at a relatively long 128 minutes, but every minute is another endeavor into the
fun, exciting, dangerous life of James Bond.  Although similar to its
predecessors in many ways, the script does feature a key change, which is a
shear delight.  Judi Dench's character of M gets much more screen time in her
third turn as the sophisticated boss of Bond, as she even gets involved with
the villains this time around.  007 can't be the only one to get all the action
can he?
The major flaw with "The World is Not Enough" lies in its screenplay, written
by Neal Purvis, Robert Wade, and Bruce Feirstein.  Although filled with
adequate action and suspense, the storyline is unsteady.  Hints are given here
and there as to where the film is actually going, but other than the fact that
oil is involved, and that Renard appears frequently, there isn't a plot.
"The World is Not Enough"s script is awfully close to those of the past two
James Bond movies, as it covers no new material, other than introducing a new
character here and there, and writing the villainess' character to perfection. 
As to why the writers don't try something new baffles me, as with today's
technology and capability in film, the Bond films could be covering new ground
in the movie industry, but instead we see the same scenes, the same characters,
and the same endings, all declaring that Bond will return.  Although not a fact
that hurts the series, it would be wonderful to see the Bond series go higher,
louder, and bigger than it has in the past, and here, in "The World is Not
Enough."
The Bottom Line: Although a solid story line is only sporadically clear, the
nineteenth installment in the ongoing series is host to Brosnan's best
performance as the 007 agent to date.

Author
Christopher Null
     I'll preface this review with the disclaimer that I am indeed aware
that James Bond thrillers do not bear any semblance to real-life
scenarios.  I'll also say that since I was a kid I've been a huge Bond
fan.
     And I'll also say that THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH is one of the worst
Bond films to come along in years.
     What's to fault?  Look no further than the story, the product of
five screenwriters who appear to have reported to a committee that
mandated no fewer than one bad pun every two minutes.  As a script, it's
a patchy mess of scenes largely lifted from any number of other Bond
flicks, while at the same time feeling like a complete anachronism in
relation to the rest of the series.
     How silly is the story?  James Bond (Brosnan) is... drum roll,
please... a bodyguard for an oil magnate's daughter (Marceau).  Sounds
like a job for the British Secret Service, doesn't it?  What a film like
this needs is a good villain, and we get Renard (Carlyle), who has a
bullet lodged in his brain and has lost his sense of touch (and can't
feel pain).
     Cool idea, only it turns out Renard is the biggest wuss of all in
the pantheon of Bond villains.  Punch him in the stomach, and he
crumples like a daisy.  Where is Jaws when you need him?
     The rest of the film is just as worthless.  Denise Richards is the
least credible nuclear physicist I can imagine, Marceau tries to vamp
her way through the film and is inexplicably dressed in a robe in almost
every scene, Brosnan looks alternately tired and bored, and whole chunks
of plot appear to have been hastily excised at the last minute.
     But the worst failing of the film is that, despite lavish
production values and intricately staged action scenes, the `action' is
amazingly lacking.  I hate to say it, but the lifeless score is largely
at fault for this, never rising to the fevered pitch that the classics
of the series could do.  Ultimately, THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH will be
forgotten quickly, adding nothing to the Bond mythology, and making one
long for the dramatic stylings of past 007s.
Director: Michael Apted
Producer: Barbara Broccoli, Michael G. Wilson
Writer: Bruce Feirstein, Michael France, Neal Purvis, Dana Stevens,
Robert Wade
Starring: Pierce Brosnan, Sophie Marceau, Denise Richards, Robert
Carlyle, Judi Dench, Robbie Coltrane, Samantha Bond, Desmond Llewelyn,
John Cleese
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Check out G-Rex.com Personal Shopper at http://www.g-rex.com

Author
John Beachem
Directed by: Michael Apted
Written by: Neal Purvis (story), Robert Wade
Well my friends, it's official, James Bond is obsolete. The once suave secret
agent has become little more than another goofy action hero. His gadgets are no
longer impressive, his banter is childish, and his once interesting adversaries
have been reduced to petty thugs. "The World is not Enough" should be a sad
conclusion to what is possibly the greatest spy series of all time, but we all
know that it won't end here. Bond won't be allowed to leave on this sad note.
He'll suffer through four or five more films before exiting on an even sadder
note. The Bond franchise is dead, and it should be buried, but like everything
in Hollywood ("Star Trek", every horror series ever made) it will continue to
be milked till reduced to a dried out husk of a film. Such is the way of things
(sorry, I'm feeling strangely philosophical).
Bond (Pierce Brosnan) is back, and this time he's protecting oil tycoon,
Elektra King (Sophie Marceau), from a villain named Renard (Robert Carlyle).
Bond seeks the aid of Valentin Zukovsky (Robbie Coltrane), an ex-KGB agent who
is now a Casino owner, in finding out just what Renard is planning. Bond's
search soon leads him to a plot involving nuclear weapons and a young,
beautiful scientist named Dr. Christmas Jones (Denise Richards). Renard strikes
first, kidnapping Bond's boss, M (Judi Dench), and setting a bomb off at MI6
headquarters. However, just when Bond thinks he has things figured out, it
turns out that nothing is what it seems.
Remember Bond's once witty exchanges with both his enemies and companions?
Well, this is what they have now been reduced to:  says "I need to get that
back or someone's going to have my butt." Bond's response? "First things
first." Very clever Mr. Bond, for a teenager perhaps. While we listen to these
juvenile comments, we're treated to some of Q's (Desmond Llewelyn) famous
gadgets. As everyone knows, Q's gadgets have only one use, yet Bond always ends
up in a situation which requires them. However, they're really pushing it when
they find a use for one of the devices here. It would appear that Q has gotten
a bit too old for this business, and they have brought in a replacement named R
(John Cleese). I personally believe that bringing John Cleese in was a
brilliant idea. Cleese is a great comic actor, and should provide some much
needed comic relief now that Bond has lost all of his wit.
As for the Bond girls, Sophie Marceau ("Braveheart", "A Midsummer Night's
Dream") is adequate I suppose, but Denise Richards (while certainly nice to
look at) couldn't act to save her life. In addition to her lack of talent, she
has films such as "Starship Troopers" and "Wild Things" under her belt, which
immediately destroy any chance of her being taken seriously. The reappearance
of Robbie Coltrane ("Message in a Bottle", "Goldeneye") is certainly welcome,
but something was done with his character that was completely uneccesary, but I
suppose I can't complain about that one instance too much, as the entire film
was rather unecessary. The largest disappointment here is the character of
Renard. The previews for the film constantly bring up the fact that he is
incapable of feeling pain, and he can drive himself harder and faster than any
other man. Nothing whatsoever is done with this talent of his. Renard is
nothing more than a petty little thug, who appears to feel pain just as easily
as anyone else but can't push himself nearly as hard as Bond can.
So the question, is how can the Bond franchise be rejuvenated? I'm not entirely
sure that it can. Bond's anitcs simply seem out of place in this day and age.
People want explosions, gunfire, and lots of action. While Bond may contain
these elements, they are not in sufficient quantity to satisfy most people. The
problem is that rather than ending the series, the geniuses and MGM have
decided to change Bond's image in a manner that is not welcome. "The World is
not Enough" would already have been a bad film, but it appears even worse when
compared to previous films in the franchise. The movie runs far too long at 127
minutes. Unless you're desperate for a new James Bond film, I'd recommend
steering clear of this one. Even if you are desperate, I'd suggest waiting for
video. I give it two out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring Pierce Brosnan; Sophie Marceau; Robert Carlyle; Denise Richards &
Robbie Coltrane
Let me start off by saying that leading up to the release of the latest Bond
film, I really wasn't looking forward to it as much as I have with some of
the previous films. I'm not sure if it was the fairly lackluster trailers or
the ever-present dread that the next film will fall back into the miserable
ways of the Timothy Dalton years. I'm happy to report that any doubts were
erased after about the first 10 minutes of the film. By that point, it was
evident that Mr. Bond was back with a vengeance. All doubts would have
probably been erased sooner except for the fact that the first ten minutes
of the film weren't exactly a pleasant experience. It seems that nobody told
the geniuses working at the theater that the house lights are supposed to be
turned off when the movie starts. It took a reminder from an audience member
to clue them in. I guess they can be excused though, taking tickets and
cleaning up popcorn between shows is extremely taxing on the brain.
Anyway, after somebody remembered what the light switch was for, I settled
in for Bond. I think the most noticeable aspect of this, the 19th film in
the series, is that it really goes back to the almost tongue in cheek style
of the Roger Moore films. There were probably more one-liners in this movie
than in the last several combined. And Bond's last one-liner in the film is
about the best of the series. The World Is Not Enough also contained perhaps
the most action of any movie of the series. Everything from wild boat chases
to the usual assortment of cool Bond gadgets trotted out just when there
seems to be no way out for 007. For the most part, the action sequences
worked very well. Although, there were a couple of times that I thought some
things were a bit over the top, even for a Bond film. I think some of the
blame can be laid at the feet of director Michael Apted. While he did a good
job for the most part, there were points in the movie, specifically during
action sequences, that he seemed to loose site of the fact that he was
making essentially an action film. Most noticeably sequences on a snow
covered mountain and one involving Bond getting through a closing door
looked like Apted thought he was filming some sort of high brow art movie.
He almost seemed like he didn't know what he was doing. But they were brief
scenes and really shouldn't take away from the otherwise solid job that
Apted did in directing.
If you have ever seen a Bond film, you won't be shocked to learn that plot
has never been their strong suit. The World Is Not Enough is no exception.
This time we have yet another over villain that Bond has to stop for the
good of the world. 007 matches wits with the terrorist Renard (Robert
Carlyle), a man who has a bullet lodged in his brain that makes him
impervious to pain. Why this point is included is beyond me. They took great
pains to explain his condition, but it only came up later in the movie as a
scene that can only be described as looking like an afterthought. Anyway,
Renard, like the typical terrorist that he is, is bent on some harebrained
scheme involving a mid-east oil pipeline. I guess world domination just
isn't as attractive to terrorists as a money making venture anymore. Bond is
brought in to protect the pipeline's owner, Elektra King (Sophie Marceau),
who is the daughter of one of Renard's recent victims. Along the way, Bond
has to enlist the help of a nuclear scientist, Dr. Christmas Jones (Denise
Richards), and his old rival Valentin Zukovsky (Robert Carlyle). Like all
Bond films, you basically just have to suspend disbelief over the plot,
since it is ridiculous beyond words. My biggest complaint would be that it
was about the most disjointed of any of the Bond films. There was at least
one point that I had to stop and try to remember why Bond was where he was
and why he was doing what he was doing. The buddy that I saw the movie with
was completely confused over an earlier kidnapping of Marceau's character.
It was alluded to earlier in the movie briefly -- although not included in
the film. Later, it became a big part of the story and left him with the
distinct feeling that he had missed something. But because it is a Bond
film, the beautiful women and nifty gadgets seem to make you forget about
script problems quite quickly. After all, it isn't Shakespeare.
How about the cast? Brosnan seems to get better with each of his appearances
as 007. I grew up with the Roger Moore version of Bond, so I really enjoyed
the lighter style that Brosnan brings to the character. Judi Dench, as M,
had a bigger role in this film than in her two previous appearances in the
role. She brought the talent with her that one would expect from an Oscar
winner. Robbie Coltrane was easily one of the best parts in Goldeneye, so it
was nice to see his Russian mobster character revived in this movie.
Coltrane gets more screen time, which simply leads to him stealing even more
scenes. Then there are the Bond girls. Sophie Marceau might be one of the
most beautiful actresses working today. There is just something about her
breathtaking eyes that makes her a natural to play the innocent victim.
Those that saw her in Braveheart know she is more than just a pretty face.
Marceau may be the most talented actress to ever play a Bond love interest.
Then we have Denise Richards. There was no doubt in my mind that she was
cast exclusively for her looks. And after you see the outfits she wears, you
won't have any trouble guessing what part of her anatomy caught the
producer's eyes. I was pleasantly surprised to find that she really did a
good job playing a nuclear scientist. Admittedly, there was one point that
the audience snickered a bit at one of her technical lines of dialogue, but
other than that she stacks up (no pun intended) to her Bond girl
predecessors nicely.
I must say that the biggest disappointment was Robert Carlyle's character.
While Carlyle did a fine job with the material that he had, his character
just never worked for me. The producers tried very hard to add more
complexity to his character, but it just never quite got off the ground. I
guess I was hoping for a bit more regarding the whole impervious to pain
aspect of his character, but the writers decided to play up the emotional
side of his character. This might have worked well in another movie, but I
don't go to see Bond movies for their deep characterizations. Last, but not
least, we have Desmond Llewelyn as Q. This is the 17th appearance for
Llewelyn as Bond's gadget guy, and he is as good as ever. Although his
screen time has grown far more limited in the past few films, he is still a
treat to watch. Rumors abound that this may be his last appearance in the
role. He says future appearances are up to a higher power. The producers
have introduced his protege and future replacement, a bumbling and somewhat
pompous character played by comedy master John Cleese. While we don't see
much of him in this film, I think it is fair to say that Desmond Llewelyn's
legacy, whenever it is passed on, will be in very capable hands.
So how does it stack up? Despite some problems, The World Is Not Enough is a
very entertaining movie. And, all things considered, what problems it does
have are small compared to some that have plagued earlier Bond movies. This
is easily the best of the Brosnan films. It may even be the best of the
entire series, certainly in the top 3. One thing is for sure, even after 19
movies, there is still plenty of life left in the James Bond series. Here's
looking forward to Bond number 20.

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Michael Apted.
Cast: Pierce Brosnan, Sophie Marceau, Robert Carlyle, Denise Richards, Judi 
Dench, Robbie Coltrane, Desmond Llewelyn, Maria Grazia Cucinotta, Ulrich 
Thomsen, John Cleese, Samantha Bond, Michael Kitchen, Colin Salmon, Serena 
Scott Thomas, John Seru, Claude-Oliver Rudolph.
1999 - 128 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for violence, mild profanity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 20, 1999.
While "The World is Not Enough" is only the third 007 film I've seen (the 
other two being 1995's "Goldeneye" and 1997's "Tomorrow Never Dies"), the 
formula has already begun to wear awfully thin. For any James Bond fan, there 
is, no doubt, a sort of comfort in walking into the theater because you know 
there will be a flashy opening sequence, followed by the obligatory opening 
credits of silhouettes of slinky women while the title song (performed by a 
musician or band) plays on the soundtrack. You know there will be at least 
two or three fast-paced action scenes each hour, that there will be a good 
girl and a femme fatale, that Bond will sack a few babes, and will get his 
kicks out of using all sorts of contraptions and weapons. You know there 
will, of course, also be a maniacal villain who has his heart set on mass 
destruction, and that he will be defeated in the grand finale, where James 
Bond will live happily ever after (at least until the next film in the 
franchise, coming to a theater near you in the fall of 2001).
Directed by Michael Apted, who has a gift for swinging from studio efforts 
(this, 1994's "Nell") to documentaries (his long running "7 Up" series; "42 
Up" is currently in limited release), "The World is Not Enough" is superior 
to the last two aforementioned Bond movies because, while still painfully 
generic in many ways, also has some less obligatory elements that surprised 
me. The film is relatively fast-paced and Apted sets up an action set-piece 
with impressive expertise and excitement. Meanwhile, the characters, 
performances, and dialogue range from delightful to downright horrid. In a 
nutshell, it's akin to cotton candy; you consume it with interest for its 
duration, but there is nothing that is particularly filling about it, and 
you're left either wanting more or nearly forgetting that you even ate it.
After the showstopping prologue that takes us from Bilbao, Spain, to across 
the waters of London, and finally, up in a hot-air balloon, things settle 
down as the actual story sets in. James Bond (Pierce Brosnan) is assigned by 
M (Judi Dench, in a juicier role than her ridiculous, Oscar-winning, walk-on 
cameo in 1998's "Shakespeare in Love") to protect Elektra King (Sophie 
Marceau), a stunning, young woman whose recently deceased father owned an 
extravagant oil pipeline, and who is suspected of being hunted down by the 
crazed Renard (Robert Carlyle). You see, Elektra was once kidnapped by Renard 
and narrowly escaped, but since then he has been shot through the skull, 
causing him to grow more physically powerful by the day, even while he is 
dying little-by-little. 
"The World is Not Enough" rarely strays far from its well-worn path of 
predictability, but there are a few virtues to mention. For one, Renard is 
unusually memorable and stirring for the villain role, and we even get to 
briefly see his softer side in a romantic scene. The success of the villain 
this time around, I think, owes itself less to the mediocre screenplay, 
written by three people(!), Neal Purvis, Robert Wade, and Bruce Feirstein, 
and more to the acting chops of Robert Carlyle, who is a character chameleon. 
Carlyle, adding a second dimension to, essentially, a one-dimensional role, 
can play a normal joe (1997's "The Full Monty"), a psychotic cannibal (1999's 
"Ravenous"), or a wacko intent on destroying the world at the role of a 
camera.
Faring best is the alluring, saucy Sophie Marceau, as Elektra King. Eluding a 
cool intelligence about her, Marceau is not only the most fascinating 
character in the film, but whenever she shares a scene with him, uncovers the 
turgid blandness of Pierce Brosnan. Having no one else to compare Brosnan 
with since he is the only Bond I've ever seen, he nonetheless is a giant bore 
of an actor who constantly sleepwalks through the same types of roles. Quite 
often while watching the film, I would almost forget all about the James Bond 
character, even though he was in almost every scene, because his costars 
rarely ever failed to upstage him. 
That is, except for Denise Richards, vacuously spouting out inane lines that 
she couldn't sell to save her life, as Dr. Christmas Jones ("Don't even think 
of making any jokes; I've heard them all"), a brilliant scientist. Richards, 
the weakest link in last summer's highly underrated "Drop Dead Gorgeous," is 
given nothing to do here, but maybe that's for the best. The fact that 
director Apted wants us to believe she is an atomic scientist is laughable 
unto itself, although that is probably appropriate in the context of the 007 
series. What isn't so forgivable is her casting altogether; Marceau makes 
such an astounding Bond girl that Richards' performance only flounders even 
more in comparison.
The final nail in the coffin of "The World is Not Enough" is its sheer 
calculation in the story department. The James Bond series is little more 
than a conveyer belt that  continuously goes around and around, never 
changing its tried-and-true course. For some 007 fans, this may be enough, 
and it really is an improvement over the previous two. Thankfully, Apted 
spares us the Talking Villain cliche that was so prominently featured in 
"Tomorrow Never Dies," but that's about all he spares us. For casual viewers 
who are not interested in James Bond, skip "The World is Not Enough," which 
offers zilch in the originality arena, go see "Sleepy Hollow," instead, and 
thank me later. You're welcome, in advance.

Author
Susan Granger
http://www.speakers-podium.com/susangranger.
Susan Granger's review of "THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH" (MGM/UA)
When you go to a James Bond film, you're looking for escapist
fantasy - and that's what you get in this 19th installment in the
long-running, most successful film franchise in cinema
history. Directed by Michael Apted, the adventure begins with a
sensational, action-packed opening sequence in Bilbao, Spain, where
Bond (Pierce Brosnan) is attacked by a sexy sniper, setting the plot
into motion. Bond's mission, this time, is to find the notorious
international terrorist (Robert Carlyle) responsible for the death of
a British oil tycoon in an explosion in M16 headquarters. This
formidable villain has a bullet lodged in his brain, rendering him
unable to feel pain. To track him down, Bond is assigned as a
bodyguard for the tycoon's beautiful daughter, Elektra (Sophie
Marceau), who is building an oil pipeline through some of the most
dangerous territory on the globe. And his only ally in remote
Azerbaijan and the Caspian Sea is a nuclear weapons expert,
Dr. Christmas Jones (Denise Richards), whose name leads to one of the
funniest last lines of a movie in years. Suave Pierce Brosnan embodies
007, delving into the emotional depth of his relationships, and Denise
Richards is amusingly absurd as a scantily clad rocket
scientist. Desmond Llewelyn returns as Q, with amazing high-tech
gadgets, including a speed-boat and BMW, and John Cleese is introduced
as R, his inept assistant. Judi Dench is back as M with Samantha Bond
as Moneypenny. "Orbis non sufficit," Latin for "The world is not
enough," is the Bond family motto (On Her Majesty's Secret Service,
1969). For James Bond fans, on the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, The
World Is Not Enough is a spectacular, fun-filled 10, packed with all
the excitement you expect - and more.  It's a jaw-dropper, so buckle
up for a wild ride!

Author
Mark O'Hara
Visit Online Film Critics Society at http://www.ofcs.org
It's hard to find a film franchise with more artifice than James Bond.  And 
what ensures the survival of this species is the natural acting of Pierce 
Brosnan.
The spy who is as ageless as Barbie finds himself the unwitting conveyor of 
a death weapon, a turnabout he finds most unsatisfying.  An oil magnate and 
friend of M - Bond's boss at British Intelligence, played by Dame Judi Dench 
- has been blown apart; what's worse, the sacred ground of MI6 headquarters 
as been desecrated.  The businessman's daughter has escaped her kidnappers 
just in time for her father's funeral.  This woman, Elektra King (Sophie 
Marceau), has inherited the fortune, and immerses herself in completing an 
oil pipeline that will span western Asia and help supply the entire Western 
world into the next century.
Our hero sets out to guard Elektra's body, as he believes a dreaded 
terrorist is back in circulation, and Elektra may be his next target.  Of 
course Bond is successful in saving her life, but then goes out on his own 
in an attempt to find the evil Renard (Robert Carlyle).  During this 
self-directed sub-mission, Bond encounters a young and brilliant scientist 
named Dr. Christmas Jones (Denise Richards).  It is in an underground 
mission complex that Bond and Dr. Jones (catchy name, no?) fall into the 
clutches of the saggy-faced fox Renard - just another level in the game of 
following the Bond formula.  Will James even have time to get friendly with 
Christmas?
The conflict is more complicated than this, and very formulaic.  There's 
really nothing we haven't seen before.  So how does Pierce Brosnan figure?  
This man's acting is not as stylized as the acting of Sean Connery - the 
only better Bond.  But Brosnan is strong precisely because he calls little 
attention to the artifice; he simply engages in corny one-liners and then 
gets into the next action sequence.  Somehow he manages to maintain his 
dignity and wit throughout;  it's as though he tolerates the whimsical 
demands of the script, and focuses his talents on what he's good at - 
interacting with others in the cast.  No one before him has played a more 
sympathetic Bond.  Most viewers won't even get angry at him for the loose 
morals he continually displays, or for the downright tacky sexual puns.  We 
even get a tiny glimpse of vulnerability.  Once it is implied that Bond has 
lost one close to him, and at various points we are convinced by Brosnan's 
wincing that his collarbone is not fully healed from the hi-jinx near the 
start of the story.
As in any Bond installment, the women are beautiful, and Sophie Marceau is 
believable enough in the multi-faceted role she is called upon to play.  As 
the American scientist Jones, Denise Richards speaks and reacts sufficiently 
well, but gives herself away when she opens her mouth.  With the accent and 
looks of a teenager, Richards fails to create the illusion of scholarly 
wisdom and worldly sophistication needed for the role.  As Bond's superior, 
M, Judi Dench acts with understatement;  we hope to see her in more scenes 
than are usually allotted , and we are not disappointed.  We even get a peek 
at the skills that helped her gain her status.
One underutilized character is Desmond Llewelyn's Q.  He appears in only two 
scenes, showing Bond a couple of gadgets and scolding him for stealing a 
miraculous boat he was saving for his retirement.  Yes, it is suggested that 
he's going, as we meet John Cleese, that master of the cameo appearance, as 
R, Q's slightly buffoonish yet haughty replacement.
Renard does an adequate job as the main villain.  Early in the narrative we 
are treated to a holographic profile of this evil man.  What's scary is that 
he has suffered a gunshot wound to the head, the bullet lodging in his 
brain, unable to be removed.  Slowly it is killing him.  The right side of 
his face resembles melted plastic, and he sports a shaven head, which causes 
him to resemble a young Alan Arkin.  He is hateable enough, but one wishes 
for a bit more motivation, a few more explanatory tidbits from the too-slick 
script.
Robbie Coltrane does a reprise of his character from "Goldeneye," Valentin 
Zukovsky, offering a degree of comic relief, and support for Bond.
Michael Apted is a very accomplished director -- he was at the helm of 
"Nell," Gorillas in the Mist," and "A Coal Miner's Daughter," among many 
others -- and it shows in this film's pace and tone.  Apted takes risks here 
and there, but never goes too far over the top.  The chase scenes are 
plenty, and have the necessary conventions of action.  Apted is able to 
blend scenes of exposition well with the action.  His only handicap is the 
script's lack of detail;  the set-up is too fast, and we sometimes find 
ourselves wondering if we missed something.
The short review is that Apted links his scenes well, and delivers a solid 
third campaign in Brosnan's naturally suave Bond.  This whole franchise has 
always been a method of delivering sex and style, wit and chase.  Don't miss 
it if you're a fan of things Bond


Author
Edwin Jahiel
THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH (UK-US,1999) * Directed by Michael Apted. 
Written by Neal Purvis, Robert Wade, Bruce Feirstein, based on a 
story by Purvis and Wade. Photography, Adrian Biddle. Editing, Jim 
Clark. Production design, Peter Lamont. Music David Arnold ("The 
WorldIs Not Enough" theme performed by Garbage and written by Arnold 
and Don Black) Produced by Michael G. Wilson and Barbara Broccoli. 
Cast: Pierce Brosnan (James Bond), Sophie Marceau (Elektra), Robert 
Carlyle (Renard),Denise Richards (Christmas Jones), Robbie Coltrane 
(Valentin Zukovsky), Desmond Llewelyn , John Cleese , Maria Grazia 
Cucinotta (Cigar Girl), Samantha Bond (Moneypenny), Michael Kitchen 
(Tanner), Colin Salmon (Robinson), Serena Scott Thomas (Dr. Molly 
Warmflash), Ulrich Thomsen (Davidov), John Seru (Gabor), 
Claude-Oliver Rudolph (Colonel Akakievich) , Dame Judi Dench (M)  An 
MGM release. 128 minutes.PG-13
James Bond flicks are among my un-guilty pleasures. They include not 
only the Sean Connery vehicles but also the oft-maligned Roger 
Moores, Timothy Daltons and the underrated George Lazenby in " On Her 
Majesty's Secret Service."  Pierce Brosnan I could take or leave. His 
are not Pierce-Arrows among Bonds. But the latest one, "The World is 
Not Enough," is a pain.
It also pains me to be negative about director Michael Apted's first 
(I think) action-action pic, when Apted has several  excellent or at 
least solid works: "Triple Echo," "Agatha," "Coal  Miner's Daughter," 
"Gorky Park," ," "Gorillas in the Mist," Class Action," "Incident at 
Oglala," "Thunderheart," "Nell."
Better yet, he is the maker of the documentary "Seven Up" (1964) 
which follows a number of kids in the UK. Its artistic/sociological 
success made Apted follow it up with the same subjects seven years 
later (in "Seven Plus Seven"), then in "21 Up," "28 Up," "35 Up." Now 
being released in the U.S.A is "42 Up." The first reports are most 
positive.
Should James Bond henceforth be called James Moribund?  The latest 
entry relies exclusively on derring-do, much of it borrowed from 
earlier Bonds. Enough is enough, especially when the plot, such as it 
is, consists of a collage of sequences which not only scream "deja 
vu," but are by and large uninteresting and characterless -- as are 
most of the characters in the story.
  "The World is Not Enough" (an awkward  title that signifies nothing) 
floats on a sea of excesses, without any of the novelty, humor and 
amusing sophistication of many earlier Bonds. It opens in a promising 
locale, Bilbao in Spain, yet the sequence's heroics feel pasted on. 
It gets worse in London, with a dumb chase and duel of hydrofoils on 
the Thames, capped by a balloon. It is all SFX (special effects) and 
nothing else. Then come the credits which -- as in an omen -- specify 
that the title song is performed by Garbage.
Bond goes to Baku in Azerbaijan, then to Kazakhstan, then to the 
Caspian Sea, then to Istanbul --and perhaps other places ending in 
"stan" for his exploits. His original assignment is to protect 
Elektra, the daughter of an assassinated oil tycoon, against a 
terrorist called Renard. That word means "fox" in French, but Renard 
is a dull, un-foxy villain. His distinction: he has a bullet in his 
head. It makes him immune to pain. But we, the audience, have no such 
immunity against boredom.
Mourning does become Elektra, since she has chic outfits in the most 
impossible locations. As played by Sophie Marceau, a very popular 
star in France but no true performer, Elektra bored me. Even when she 
turned out to be a nasty little number and not a true victim. There 
is sex, of course, with Bond. It is the sort of thing that in keeping 
with our new ethos (hypocritical or not) plays down sensuality, 
nudity, flesh-photography and groans. It is a dutiful acknowledgment 
of the old Bond-as-womanizer thing, here sanitized and clearly used 
as a filler.
A second woman is introduced, Doctor (sic) Christmas Jones, who is a 
scientist, joins forces with Bond, also bodies -- another filler. 
Denise Richards, another one of the USA's fifty million "celebrities" 
looks and sounds like a Valley Girl, even though she was born in 
Illinois.
When Bond meets her, he's supposed to be Russian and speaks Russian 
to her and others, but somehow it is English., then it becomes "real" 
English.  Don't ask. Says Dr. Christmas :"Your English is very good 
for a Russian" He: "I studied at Oxford." Should I comment?
  Bond wears designer suits no matter what the situation, place, feats 
and explosions are. He also has special see-through eyeglasses to 
peer at hidden weapons on men and undies on women. By the way, when 
it comes to pulchritude, there are quite a few beautiful women 
glimpsed here and there, but these do not include the lead roles.
There are torture scenes in the film, but the real torture is 
watching it. Not simply during its full 128 minutes, but from minute 
5 to the end. A teen sitting in front of me at the rather sparsely 
attended projection (it was a morning show) got up four times to get 
to the theater's concession. If this doesn't speak loudly what does? 
Indeed, there is no continuity, no suspense, nothing that an absentee 
viewer could miss. Nor is there any  "sophistication," which is 
outrageous but funny in the better Bonds. Psychology rates zero,
As for acting -- what acting?  As for humor, just a feeble and leaden 
attempt to sketch in John Cleese as the M.I. 6 new gadget-maker. As 
for novelties, the main one has Bond having a broken collar-bone, 
wincing at times but still able to do his thing. We've gone from the 
impossible to the supernatural, I guess.
The movie, which went through a slew of working titles, officially 
has three writers. Obviously though, it had everybody else and his 
sister pitching in with "ideas." It all results in no sense nonsense, 
it all has no oomph, rhythm or continuity, it all proves again the 
saying that "a camel is a horse made by a committee." The ratio 
between cost and "quality" must make this as bad an action flick as 
any.
It is painfully clear that the movie (like too many others) is aiming 
at a pre-teen, teen, and early post-teen market of kids who have no 
familiarity (at least on the big screen) with the rich Bond tradition.
Why do I still give it one star then? Because I have a soft spot for 
Apted (critics are human after all); because the gimmick of oil and 
pipelines has a real model these days; because Robbie Coltrane, as a 
big Russian Mafioso, saves whatever scenes he is in.

Author
Stephen Graham Jones
The World is Not Enough: shaken, stirred, but never whipped
In of the trademark opening stunts of The World is Not Enough, James Bond
(Pierce Brosnan) rides a rope and a prayer down like ten sheer stories, sets
down lightly into the bemused sidewalk traffic, then accidentally catches
the eye of a passerby. What we expect at this point is one of his signature
lines to diffuse the situation--'Elevator was out' or something of that
brand, something wry and John McLane-ish, downplaying whatever just went on
(normalizing it, so he can re-enter the 'normal' world). But, instead of
delivering that line in late-Bond (Roger Moore +) fashion, this Bond
resists, just walks away, becoming part of the crowd as a good espionage
agent should, which intimates early on that maybe we're finally coming full
circle, getting back to the Connery-bonds, the ones everyone nostalgically
remembers as 'pure,' undecadent, (Kirk vs. Picard) when intrigue was still
more primal to the story than special effects, resourcefulness still more
impressive than gadgetry.
Not that this James Bond isn't resourceful in the face of danger, as he
establishes time and again, against wave after wave of videogame bad guy.
And The World is Not Enough does have more story to it than any Bond to come
along in awhile. It's just that, instead of continuing to resist that
'irresistable' line as he does at first, Bond takes the easy way out the
rest of the movie, even going so far as to provoke a few groans of
embarrassment here and there.
As for the story, though, it is strong, does do what we like to have
done--putting Bond on the defensive. And, as the trailer gives away, this
time it's personal, the problem is in-house. M (Judi Dench) even gets
kidnapped. And, returning to the Moore-era, this time we even have a
'more-than-human' bad guy (Robert Carlyle). What's particularly refreshing,
too, is that the bad guys' motives aren't as generic as taking over the
world, holding it hostage, exacting some poetic revenge, etc. They just want
to get filthy rich. And with oil, at that (as opposed to diamonds, diamonds
in space, etc). And of course there's all the rampant womanizing we expect,
along with the names--Elektra King (as in Agememnon and crowd, yes; Sophie
Marceau) and Dr. Christmas Jones (Denise Richards), the latter of which
provides Bond with more quip-opportunities than one secret agent should ever
have to deal with.
There are some touching moments, too, though, unexpectedly. Well, two: the
first is a little farewell to Q (Desmond Llewelyn), which takes the form of
a torch-passing ceremony to the 'new' Q--a bumbling R (John Cleese). The
other 'touching' moment is late in the movie, when M accidentally sees Bond
using his famed license to kill, in cold blood. It's a rare moment in the
007 series, to have the brutality of what's going on register on someone's
face. The thing is, though, it's left at that, not followed through.
Granted, in a series this certain of another episode, you can span two years
waiting for a response, but still, it would have been nice to have a little
closure on it now. At least a nod of acknowledgment from one of the primary
players, something. As it is, though, the Fleming/Broccoli-formula
effectively subverts any of that, and neatly spits Bond and his buxom
sidekick out into yet another variation of the lifeboat on the ocean, to do
what they do best. He deserves it after saving the world, right? It's not
all about Queen and country . . .
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com/

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     There is a spectrum of styles for the plots of Bond films.  On one
hand you can Style I in which you have comic book super-villains who
are trying literally to destroy the whole world; you can have women
with dirty-joke names (e.g., Pussy Galore); you can have clues that
fall into Bond's lap by coincidences or by villain over-confidence, so
it looks like Bond always knows what he is doing; Bond always has just
the right gizmo to get out of a nasty situation; Bond never gets
injured or always heals in seconds; and the villain destroyed when Bond
pulls one conveniently located switch.  DR. NO started this trend and
it is not surprising that it seems childish.  Ian Fleming actually
wrote the plot of DR. NO first for Captain Jamaica his planned
childrens television show.  When Captain Jamaica did not sell he
rewrote the story as a supposedly adult spy novel in his then fledgling
James Bond series.
     On the other hand you can have Style II spy story.  That puts Bond
into the shadowy half-world of international espionage where he wants
to get a microfilm that tells with whom Iraq is making secret treaties;
Bond does not know who his friends are and who his enemies are; when a
bullet hits his arm it is out of action for the rest of the story; Bond
has to think very fast frequently; and occasionally Bond makes very
wrong decisions.  FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE was an effort to move in that
direction, though John LeCarre or Len Deighton writes more in that
style.  There are people who just love the Style I Bond films and they
are an easy formula to write.  I prefer the latter and subjectively
placing a Bond film on this spectrum is how I judge if it is a good
film or not.  THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH has been released with much less
hype than most Bond films, and while it is still closer to the
unrealistic style of story, it still is more realistic than most Bond
films.
     In Spain James Bond (Pierce Brosnan) is picking up a stash of
money recovered from a mission that killed an MI6 agent.  He is
betrayed and nearly killed, though his life is saved by the
intervention of a mysterious sniper.  Bond returns the money to its
industrialist owner only to find out the money was booby-trapped to
explode and kill its rightful owner.  Explode it does rather
spectacularly giving rise to an impressive boat chase.  The money had
been ransom for the industrialist's daughter Elektra (Sophie Marceau).
Bond realizes that the means to kill the industrialist required not
only the money and an assassin a short distance away to trigger it, it
also required that the industrialist be wearing a special doctored
lapel pin.  This implies that the victim must have been betrayed from
within his own organization.  Bond immediately realizes that anyone who
would use such an arcane, inconvenient, and telltale mechanism to try
to kill someone and still get it to work must be impressive indeed.
That implies that his next victim might be Elektra who slipped through
the assassins fingers once already.  Elektra is continuing her father's
project to build an oil pipeline across Western Asia.  Bond discovers
the terrorist who kidnapped her is an ex-KGB agent whom a bullet in the
brain has left unable to feel pain This makes the assassin, Renard
stronger every day.  Bond dons a cover as a businessman and goes in to
protect Electra only to have her see through his cover in seconds.  She
is a strong-willed woman and highly capable woman with no intention of
cooperating with Bond.  But he still determines to protect her.
     This film makes several concessions to realism previous Brosnan
Bond films would not.  Bond gets hurt several times in this film and at
least for a short time it slows him down.  He also makes mistakes
trusting the wrong people.  Bond deduces that the briefcase of money is
a trap, but it is not soon enough to prevent the murder plan from going
through.  Hence Bond is more fallible than in previous films.  The
villain's plan is more flamboyant than simply embarrassing the British
Secret Service and killing Bond as it was in FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE, but
the plotter and the plot are far less exaggerated than Hugo Drax and
his plan in MOONRAKER.  This also is an improvement.  And more than in
recent films it takes Bond a while to sort out good guys from bad guys.
The ending is more tense than spectacular.  These criteria do not
guarantee a good Bond film, but certainly it is more intelligent than
Bond films have been of late.
     Traditionally Michael Apted's documentaries have been much better
than his fiction films.  But here his touch does nothing but good for
the Bond series.  Either Pierce Brosnan is starting to get the hang of
being Bond or I am just starting to think of him that way, but he seems
more natural than he has in the past.  Robert Carlyle as the assassin
Renard is acceptable in a role very different from his in THE FULL
MONTY or TRAINSPOTTING.  He did not need the bullet in the head gimmick
to be a good villain.  Sophie Marceau and Denise Richards are
acceptable in their roles.  Some critics have found it unrealistic to
have Denise Richards with shorts and bare midriff as a nuclear
scientist disarming warheads.  To me that just means the critics are
more out of touch with the world than are the filmmakers.  That job
would probably be taken by someone just out of graduate school and
Richards is reasonable in the part.  Less reasonable is John Cleese as
R, the buffoon successor to Q.  Casting Cleese is a step in the wrong
direction.  The series already has plenty of chuckles and needs more
credibility.
     Usually the best part of a Bond film is the artistic opening
credit sequence which used to be done by Maurice Binder.  The visuals
in this one are on the theme of oil and seeing women in the crude in
the nude has all the taste of women mud-wrestling.  Most Bond films
take place in exotic settings which serve as product placement for
tourist destinations.  Even Istanbul seems unromantic in this film and
Azerbaijan is not vying very hard for tourist dollars.
     MINOR SPOILERS... MINOR SPOILERS... MINOR SPOILERS... MINOR
SPOILERS...
     THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH uses a lot of the trademark Bond touches.
Somehow the gun-sight opening at the beginning of a new Bond film still
always packs a bit of a thrill.  In this film Bond is once again a
womanizer, which probably was some of the fun of the earliest Bonds.
Traditions I could do without include the extended skiing sequences and
the tiresome running gag that Bond is so often caught having sex in the
final scene.  Ideas in this one that seem foolish include a pair of
special glasses whose power seems ridiculous.  I am not an expert but
it would take some convincing for me to believe the loss of one source
of oil would so badly affect Britain.  They do have sources in a lot of
other places, including the North Sea.  It would take even more
convincing that anyone would want to hold a half-grapefruit-sized
hemisphere of weapons-grade plutonium in their bare hand.

Author
Justin Felix
All of my film reviews are archived at 
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix
This review has been submitted to The Shrubbery  
http://www.theshrubbery.com
Any comments about this review?  E-mail me at justinfelix@yahoo.com
Screenplay by Bruce Feirstein, Michael France, Neal Purvis, Dana 
Stevens, and Robert Wade. 
Starring Pierce Brosnan, Sophie Marceau, and Denise Richards. 
Rated PG-13 (contains lots of Bond violence, Bond sex, and Bond 
innuendo)  128 mins.
Synopsis:  British secret agent James Bond sleeps with three women (a 
doctor, a nuclear physicist, and a wealthy oil inheritor, no less!), 
drives a nifty car, and saves the world from a guy who has a bullet in 
his head. 
Comments:  This is Bond Film #19.  Nineteen James Bond movies.  It's 
incredible when you think about it.  After the sequel number goes up too 
high, usually filmmakers drop the numbers from their titles because they 
know that audiences get a little suspicious about the quality of 
sequels.  ALIEN 4, hence, becomes ALIEN RESURRECTION, and HELLRAISER 4 
changes into HELLRAISER: BLOODLINE.  The people behind the Bond films, 
however, are even smarter.  The movie titles make no mention of their 
main character, and none of them suggest that they are a sequel.  THE 
WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH, for example, bears no relation to the previous Bond 
film, TOMORROW NEVER DIES.  To further the cleverness, both titles are 
really cool.  I remember seeing a poster for THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH 
during the summer and immediately being drawn into the film's hype.  Has 
there been a cooler film title in recent memory than THE WORLD IS NOT 
ENOUGH?
THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH is not only the nineteenth Bond outing, but it 
is also the third movie featuring Pierce Brosnan as 007.  I'm not going 
into an elaborate discussion of which Bond actor has been the best; most 
argue correctly that it will always be Sean Connery.  Brosnan, however, 
has done a pretty good job at establishing himself as a respectable 
second.  THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH is certainly not the best Bond film 
ever made (indeed Brosnan's last outing in TOMORROW NEVER DIES is 
slightly better), but it is a respectable, watchable action flick good 
for a Saturday afternoon matinee. 
THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH doesn't deviate much from the traditional Bond 
formula.  Many of the same supporting characters appear here: Miss 
Moneypenny, M, and Q.  Bond scores with several good-looking 
models-turned-actresses.  He drives around in a souped-up sports car.  
The world is in danger, and he saves the day.  Sometimes the routine is 
good to see.  Unfortunately, another part of the formula exists in this 
film: bad guys don't kill the good guys--they just talk and talk until 
the good guys find an avenue to break free and save the day.  I don't 
know how many times someone had a chance to ice either Bond, M, or the 
nuclear physicist (more about this ridiculous character in a bit) but 
managed to screw it up because either (a) they wanted to talk, (b) they 
wanted to gloat, or (c) they wanted to restrain their captor for some 
other bad guy to talk or gloat to.  Sometimes you just want to tell the 
bad guys to shoot.  They'd win that way. 
There are actually a couple bad guys this time around.  I won't spoil 
the fun by revealing who the secret bad guy is; although, if you have 
half a brain, you'll figure it out pretty quickly.  The "bad guy from 
the beginning," Renard, is fairly original though.  Apparently, he has a 
bullet lodged in his brain that's slowly killing him.  That makes him, 
in some respects, more dangerous than other Bond villains because, let's 
face it, he doesn't have much to lose.  Also, apparently, this bullet 
makes him numb to outside stimuli, so he doesn't feel pain.  This makes 
him a bad ass when it comes to fighting.  It may not be realistic, but 
it's still cool. 
The most absurd aspect of THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH is not its convoluted 
storyline or electronic gadgets.  Denise Richards, pouty supermodel babe 
from such campy movies as STARSHIP TROOPERS and WILD THINGS, laughably 
tries to pass herself off as a nuclear physicist.  Folks, this is the 
most ridiculous casting I've seen in a long while.  My friend and I 
laughed a number of times as she spouted dialogue unconvincingly.  She 
was included, I'm sure, just so we could see her do a number of wet 
T-shirt scenes in the ultimate showdown with Renard inside a flooding 
submarine.  Oh, by the way, this "scientific thinker's" name is Dr. 
Christmas Jones.  I don't know which is worse: her name or the final 
Bond line in the film as he scores with Dr. Jones.  I'll give you a 
hint; it has to do with the old adage that Christmas comes but once a 
year.  Ugh. 
While THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH may not be a groundbreaking or original 
entry in the action film genre, it is still 007 and still entertaining.  
The film's opening, featuring the title song performed by the rock group 
Garbage, is quite good.  The closing credits promise that Bond will 
return in another film.  At least, unlike other film series that have 
gone on well too long like BATMAN and HELLRAISER, this is something to 
look forward to rather than cringe at. 

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten
 MGM/United Artists
 Director: Michael Apted
 Writer: Bruce Feirstein, Neal Purvis, Robert Wade
 Cast: Pierce Brosnan, Sophie Marceau, Denise Richards,
Desmond Llewelyn, John Cleese, Judi Dench, Maria Grazia
Cucinotta, Robert Carlyle
   The Bond series has as much stamina on the screen as its
eponymous hero has in bedrooms from Baku to Borneo. 
Face it: we're addicted to Ian Fleming's character and have
allowed him to get us to come 19 times to his pictures over
the past 37 years.  In the final note of "The World Is Not
Enough," we get the message "James Bond Will Return."
Trust him.  The series faces just one danger, and that hazard
is the opposite of the one that many viewers will point out,
i.e. that we're getting tired of the same ol' same ol'.  To the
contrary. Like our beloved dogs and cats who favor routine in
their lives, we enjoy returning to 007 just as we take to meat
loaf and mashed potatoes.  Bond is comfort food.  We know
what to expect and we savor the experience.  No: the real
danger is that the series, notwithstanding the formula, has of
late been veering from its usual trajectory, imitating the other
action-adventure movies which have co-opted the British
agent.  In the past, we've been delighted by what makes
Bond special--his appeal to all women, villainous and
virtuous alike, confirming that fair maid is ne'er won by
political correctness; the fancy gadgets such as the boats that
turn into planes, the autos sporting a dazzling array of
options, the wrist watch that shoots up wires for its wearer to
climb out of danger--given him by the old, reliable Q, still
played by the dependable Desmond Llewelyn.  Given the
advent of such agitated pix as "Con Air," "Executive
Decision," "Lethal Weapon" and the Jerry Bruckheimer
assortment including "Top Gun" and "The Rock," we need
007 to be different while he remains the same.  We attend
Cubby Broccoli's productions because we want to hear, over
and over, "Shaken, not stirred," and "My name is Bond;
James Bond."  These rituals are still in evidence with the
current release, but with all the noise that happily envelops
us, the explosions that down nasty choppers and crack
sinister oil pipelines, and the exotic locations in Northern
Spain, Azerbaijan, and Turkey, we're on familiar turf.  "The
World is Not Enough" is not different enough from the
universe of action-adventure movies that bring in the fans not
only in America but throughout the free world.
   In his dealings with the women, Christmas Jones (Denise
Richards) and Elektra King (Sophie Marceau), James Bond
(Pierce Brosnan) eschews some of the political correctness
he was saddled with in "Tomorrow Never Dies."  Instead, he
takes on a new physical vulnerability, a dislocated collar bone
that he acquires in a 30-foot fall--happily not one that
influences his chief preoccupation, in which he indulges with
the physician giving him a clean bill of health, Dr. Molly
Warmflash (Serena Scott Thomas).  Indeed the very opening
scene, the longest such introduction in the Bond series, is the
best largely because writers Neal Purvis, Robert Wade and
Bruce Feirstein give 007 some clever double-entendres and
puns, particularly political ones that the young 'uns may not
catch.  Especially biting is Bond's flippant parlance with a
Swiss banker that recalls the recent brouhaha over that
country's noncompliance with debts owed to Holocaust
survivors and their families.  "If you can't trust a Swiss
banker, who can you trust?" he counsels.  (The opening
sequence, in Bilbao, Spain, makes use of the new
Guggenheim Museum there, and Bond has gone to the area
to pick up some money recovered from a murdered agent.)  
   From a tense boat race on the Thames that could rival any
car-chase scene in John Frankenheimer's "Ronin," Bond
travels imperceptibly (without luggage and with an apparently
hidden array of $2,000 suits) to the Caspian Sea, taking in
the tawdry scenery of the Azerbaijan oil fields and the beauty
of the St. Sophia Mosque spotted through the mist from the
waters of Istanbul.  His principal enemy is an anarchist known
as Renard (Robert Carlyle), who is soon to die from a bullet
lodged in his brain that is traveling through the medula
oblongata.  (The doctor who failed in his attempt to remove it
was executed.)  Since Renard feels no pain, he
becomes one of Bond's strongest opponents, and therein lies
one of the cleverest concepts of this latest entry.  Renard
is determined for reasons made almost clear in the story line
to blow up the city of Istanbul with a nuclear device, while the
lovely Elektra--who may or may not be his accomplice--keeps
the good guys guessing and provides a formidable match for
the British agent.
   Except for the dialogue in the opening scene, most of the
colloquy is mere filler between episodes of frantic activity--on
speedboats, in submarines, in a balloon, and on the ski trail. 
Michael Apted does not treat any of this agitated movement
in a particularly elegant style, leaving us to enjoy principally
the game of guessing Elektra's true motivations, the loyalty of
caviar-loving businessman Valentin Zukovsky (Robbie
Coltraine), the unusual plight of M (Judi Dench) who becomes
quite directly involved in the scheme, and the comic support
of John Cleese in a cameo role. Denise Richards is
overwhelmingly outmatched by Sophie Marceau, the former's
bearing as stiff as an oil pipeline, while Ms. Marceau, though
notably sexier in William Nicholson's sudsy "Firelight," steals
the scenes she's in.
    The title of the movie comes from James Bond's family
motto , orbis non sufficit, which surfaced in his 1969 film "On
Her Majesty's Secret Service."  In this case, the slogan
becomes apropos as Bond is advised that he could have
received the world if only he sold out and joined the
conspirators.  As for Pierce Brosnan himself, one of the
world's handsomest men has settled in nicely to the role and
this time shows that he can really act.  Given the reality that
we can't expect a great deal of originality in the action
sequences, what we need is a lot more sparkling dialogue:
More double entendres, and especially, more contemporary
send-ups of the absurdities of the current world's politics, as
shown so adeptly in this film's opening sequence.
Rated PG-13.  Running Time: 128 minutes.  (C) 1999
Harvey Karten, film_critic@compuserve.com

Author
Fontaine Lien
Welcome to the world of Bond, James Bond; where the women are
beautiful, the scenery is dazzling, the bad guys are stupid, the jokes
are corny, BMW hawks its newest Beamer like a maniac, and where James
Bond continues to elude the AIDS virus despite his philandering (the
SNL skit doesn't seem all that unlikely right now).
Perhaps I am doing the series a disservice because I haven't seen the
older films.  This is only the second James Bond film I've seen, and
already this latest MGM offering seems eerily similar to "Tomorrow
Never Dies" in structure, characters, and dialogue.  I wonder if all
of them are like this?  Save for a couple of minor differences,
"TWINE"is all I expected it to be based on my viewing of "TND."
While I've always been a fan of the series' stylish, computer
generated opening sequences accompanied by a Bondish theme song, I've
gotta ask: "What were they THINKING?" Though by the end of the film I
realized what the black gooey substance was, that was still pretty
disturbing to watch.  The background images were seemingly taken from
any graphic designers' stock of ready-made patterns.
The plot was all right, designed more for capitalizing on the studio's
special effects budget than for winning an award in script-writing, of
course.  I've gotta admit though, I liked the twist in the middle of
the movie, even though many must have seen it coming.  It was great to
see a Bond girl as not just the victim of the archetype villain, but a
better and even more wicked and coldblooded manipulator.  I'm glad
Sophie Marceau has taken the role of Elektra King; I was getting sick
of seeing her in the gentle, meek, porcelain doll roles.  She has
disarming features, which makes her particularly effective in the role
of the villain.  I also enjoyed Robert "Full Monty" Carlyle as the
"other" villain; though they were pretty vague about his motives.
Yes, in typical Bond fashion, substance was sacrificed for style.  I
won't go on about this because I'm sure you are all familiar with
their way of filmmaking.  Okay, let's insert this gadget here because
it looks cool on screen.  All right, lets make Pierce do this and do
that for God knows what reason because that would make for a great
action sequence.  Bullet in the medulla makes one grow stronger?  Must
be a new medical technique invented by the oh-so-convincing *Doctor*
Christmas Jones.  Science is made to look ridiculous.  And please, for
the next movie lets not have the characters dropping puns all over the
place?  It gets old.  Fast.  The action scenes seemed frivolous and
farfetched, but what the hell, they looked cool.  Especially that
beautiful mountain they skied on.  Could've just borrowed one of those
cool snowmobiles huh?  One of the things I like about these movies --
the exotic locales.
I've never liked Denise Richards (Christmas Jones).  TWINE only
further solidifies my opinion of her as a pouty-lipped bad actress.
Nuclear physicist?  Yeah, that's REALLY believable. Just hearing her
deliver her lines made me want to puke.  Put some punch into it, girl!
She and Pierce had absolutely no chemistry together.  But then again,
James Bond sleeps with anyone, chemistry or no chemistry :-)
A couple of standouts that I really enjoyed, though . . . The
expansion of the role of M, done wonderfully by Judi Dench.  In TWINE,
she emerges as not only Bond's supervisor but a much more dynamic and
complex character.  Dench brings to M a dignity befitting her age and
position (perhaps it has to do with Dench's really status in life.)
Kudos to the scene on the dock.  On one hand we've got James Bond
manipulating his slick car, but I'm glad we also got a glimpse of what
the other characters were doing.  In too many incidents we see the
main character dealing with a dangerous situation, and later we see
him meet up with his buddies without knowing how his buddies escaped.
Many might think the worst of "TWINE." And yes, it does have flaws,
but I suppose I was happy with what I saw because I didn't expect
anything else. Perhaps they're churning out these movies according to
a set formula because this is what people have come to associate with
the 007 series.  A story involving lots of money, a freakish villain,
a femme fatale, cool gadgets and killer stunts.  Naked women prancing
across the screen in the opening sequence.  Cheesy and fraught with
impossibilities, yes; but that is the moral of the story.  I expected
James Bond and nothing else, and I was reasonably happy.
*Female Fashion Instinct: Nice gown Elektra wore to the Casino.

Author
Berge Garabedian
Test your skill at our James Bond Movie Trivia Quiz exclusively at
http://www.joblo.com/
For this special occasion, JoBlo's Movie Emporium was lucky enough to land
an exclusive interview with the man behind the men who have portrayed him
since this unstoppable franchise began in 1962...none other than James Bond
himself. The floor is yours, gentlemen.
JOBLO: How do you do, Mr. Bond?
JAMES BOND: Bond, James Bond.
JOBLO: Yes, I know. Uhhmm, Mr. Bond, I just came back from a preview of your
latest film called THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH, and I will be honest with you in
saying that it was a good film, but it didn't spark of much originality, you
know what I mean?
JAMES BOND: (looking around aimlessly) Do you know if the waitress is coming
around? Originality, you say, well tell me this, Mr. American, why mess with
a good thing, do YOU know what I mean?
JOBLO: Yes, I understand what you're saying, Mr. Bond, but what I'm saying
is, and this is with no disrespect intended-
JAMES BOND: I bet! (looking at another table) Is that Pussy Galore over
there?
JOBLO: It's a good movie, but I don't know, it just seemed to be missing
that spark. I mean, I've completely forgotten about the whole movie and I
saw it less than an hour ago. What does that say?
JAMES BOND: It says that you are slow of mind, my friend.
JOBLO: I don't know, Mr. Bond, I mean, it's weird, because the film starts
off with a bang, and I mean a real BIG bang, what a cool opening sequence.
JAMES BOND: No stunt doubles either, my computer geek friend, that was
aaaaaaall James!
JOBLO: Well, whoever it was, it was way cool. I can't say that I remember a
better opening sequence in any of your other movies. Also, the gadgets were
all there aplenty and very original, the action scenes were decent, but one
too many explosions for my taste-
JAMES BOND: I told Mike to cut a couple out, but would he listen? Noooooo-
JOBLO: You know what the bottom line is here, James? The bottom line is that
if people go into this film expecting a "James Bond" movie, that is exactly
what they'll get. James Bond. With all his cooky gadgets, his sexy "Bond"
girls, his cool cars, slick suits...
JAMES BOND: What organization did you say you were with?
JOBLO: (signaling to the waitress) One Martini for my friend over here,
shaken, not stirred.
JAMES BOND: You were saying?
JOBLO: One thing that did kinda bug me was the fact that it seemed to go on
forever. I mean, how long was this thing, over two hours at least!
JAMES BOND: I think it's about two hours and ten minutes, but that's WITH
the credits, which you shouldn't really count because--
JOBLO: Whatever, James. It could've been cut is all I'm saying. No need to
take it personally. Sheesh!
JAMES BOND: But what about the girls, huh? The girls were pretty, weren't
they?
JOBLO: Pretty, schmetty. Sophie Marceau was great but what's the deal with
Denise Richards, a "nuclear physicist" running around in a tight tank top
all movie? Plleaaaaase! I mean, don't get me wrong here, James, she looked
great and all, but boy-oh-boy, you guys really caught the Jennifer Love
Hewitt fever, eh?
JAMES BOND: (grabbing his Martini from the waitress) Hi there. I'm Bond.
James Bond. And your pretty name would be? (waitress grimaces and walks
away).
JOBLO: Ouch! Denied!
JAMES BOND: (looking into his glass) Excuse me, there's no olive in here!
JOBLO: Forget it, dude. All you are to them is a guy in a suit with horribly
corny pick-up lines. You're just like any other agent in this town. Which
reminds me, what's with all the corny lines in this film? Me thinks you guys
have totally overplayed your double-entendre card. Everything you say seems
to have a sexual connotation attached to it. You gotta get with the times,
James, it's the 90s man, AIDS and stuff.
JAMES BOND: What was your name again?
JOBLO: Blo. JoBlo.
JAMES BOND: Blow? Interesting. Have you ever thought about being in a Bond
movie?
JOBLO: Okay, take it easy, Jimmy, this is when things could get ugly. Let's
wrap it up, shall we?
JAMES BOND: Wrap away, ol' boy!
JOBLO: Well, I guess I could recommend this film to all people who want to
see a good James Bond movie filled with all of the typical James Bond
devices including some cool action sequences, an over the top villain and
worldly master plan, the Austin Powers-type "torturing instead of killing"
scenes-did you see that movie, by the way?
JAMES BOND: Overrated. Mike Myers is a genius though, that Dr. Evil
character was quite the hoot!
JOBLO: Like I said, if you don't mind the corny lines and the wet T-shirt
shots of the Bond girls jumping around while Bond saves the world, check it
out. It is what it is! All in all, a decent time at the movies.
JAMES BOND: I personally think you're being a little overcritical, but I
suppose you do have a right to your opinion.
JOBLO: That I do, dear Jimmy, that I do. All work and no play makes JoBlo a
dull boy.
JAMES BOND: By the way, what are you doing after this interview? Maybe you'd
like to come back to my place and I'll show you this new "device" that Q
built for me...
JOBLO: Uuuuhmm, no thanks, dude. I'm all good on this side of the road, if
you catch my drift? (To waitress) Check, please?
JAMES BOND: (reaching for JoBlo's hand) But I'm trying to "get with the
90s", Mr. Blow...
JOBLO: This interview has gotten waaaay out of hand, dude (gets up and
leaves). Thanks for your time, man. You're pretty cool for an ol' geezer.
MOONRAKER is still my favorite though. Jaws rocked!
JAMES BOND: (as JoBlo leaves) Oh, C'MON, I was just teasing for God's
sakes!! (to himself) Damn Yankees take everything a Brit says so seriously.
We can be funny too, you know. Doesn't anybody remember Benny Hill? (looking
back at the other table) Pussy, Pussy is that you!?
(The previous interview was not an actual event and did not mean to imply or
attempt to imply anything about Mr. Bond or his great franchise, other than
to present an alternative method for JoBlo to present some of his menial
observations on said film. James Bond does not really exist. We apologize
for the ruse.)

Author
Steve Evans
Cinema Uprising
Take an aisle seat with the most dangerous film critic in America
The World is Not Enough Dir: Michael Apted. Starring Pierce Brosnan, Sophie
Marceau, Robert Carlyle, Denise Richards, Robbie Coltrane and Judi Dench.
The pitch: James Bond races around the globe to stop a brain-damaged
terrorist from disrupting the world's oil supply.
Secret Agent 007, now in his 19th official outing, can still act suave,
caressing women, guns and cocktails with equal ease. But the series itself
is looking long in the tooth and short on ideas.
After an old friend is killed in a bombing inside MI6 headquarters, Bond
resolves to protect the man's beautiful but emotionally scarred daughter
Elektra (Marceau, who can plop her feet on our coffee table any time). The
bewitching Elektra was once kidnapped by Bosnian terrorist Carlyle, who
still carries a bullet in his head from an attempted assassination. Although
he survived the hit, the bullet has caused irreparable neurological damage.
Carlyle can no longer feel pain. Or pleasure. The injury is slowly killing
him. Too bad this idea never develops into a big payoff at the climax. Like
most of the action in this busy film, the issue of brain damage is
introduced and quickly forgotten as Carlyle obsesses on blowing up an oil
pipeline in the Caspian Sea (think fast, film fans: how many times has the
climax of a Bond movie hinged on the threat of a thermonuclear device?).
Bond travels by jet ski and snow ski, by boat, rocket-equipped BMW and
submarine. Curiously, though, for all his globe-trotting, we never see the
super spy climb aboard or disembark from a plane (Perhaps the ancient Q and
his new sidekick -- John Clesse, in an amusing cameo -- have developed a
secret teleportation device so Bond can get around).
Brosnan, reprising the role for the third time, seems to relish his
assignment. His confidence and wry manner are well-suited to the part, which
demands a seriousness that Roger Moore could never muster and a levity that
eluded Timothy Dalton in his two-picture incarnation as Bond. Brosnan has
shrugged off the Remington Steel albatross and settled for a style somewhere
between Moore and Dalton. Still, nobody kicked super-villain ass, defused
nuclear bombs, stroked babes, smoked cigarettes, sipped martinis, raced
Aston Martins, knew more about fine wine, gave Q a hard time or muttered
more amusing quips than Sean Connery, his own bad self. And if Connery
wouldn't look absurd trying to hold his toupee in place  or face serious
risk of cardiac thrombosis (he turned 69 in August)  we'd say bring him
back, put a Walther PPK in his shoulder holster and let's rock.
If this sounds like carping, then the gentle readers of Cinema Uprising
should know that we have seen every Bond film, most of them multiple times.
We even enjoy Casino Royale (1967), the much-maligned spoof that purists don
't count as a legitimate Bond film, although in many ways it is better than
most of the movies starring Roger Moore (as Bond, or anyone else, for that
matter). So we're predisposed toward this Bond character. We know the
formula. And Brosnan is the best actor to get behind the role since Connery
vowed `nevermore.'
But the goons behind the camera are so focused on pyrotechnics, good as they
are, and gee-whiz gadgets, that no one bothered with the script. We're not
talking about believable plots. Hell, if that was a prerequisite, there
wouldn't be any Bond films.
The problem with The World is Not Enough is the characters have nothing
intelligent to say. The new Bond girl, Christmas Jones (Richards), is a case
in point. First off, the best Bond girls have ridiculously suggestive and
sexist names like Pussy Galore (Goldfinger), or Holly Goodhead (Man with the
Golden Gun), not stupid monikers like Christmas Jones, which is just a setup
for the worst closing line in any of the Bond movies. Richards plays a
nuclear bimbo-scientist, with an emphasis on the bimbo. Talk about
unbelievable: If this doe-eyed valley girl knows anything about nuclear
physics, then we'll eat plutonium. Richards hit her stride in Wild Things
(1998), a gleefully sleazy picture that still shows up on cable TV at 2 a.m.
Such roles illustrate the breadth of her talent, which doesn't stand up to
the stress of dialogue or facial expression.
Bond's tricked-out BMW turns in a better performance. Worse, he shows more
emotion for the car when it is destroyed than he does for Ms. Richards  or
the remarkable Ms. Marceau  who is a wild and an untamed thing, yet sadly
impervious to Bond's particular method of rehabilitation.
Even the fine Shakespearean actress Judi Dench, starring here as a matronly
M, is forced to declare obvious
plot points that we can see for ourselves. The portly Coltrane fares better,
reprising his role from Goldeneye (1995) as a Russian gangster. He provides
equal parts cynicism and comic relief.
The World is Not Enough just isn't enough to sate the legions of Bond fans
who must wait another two years for the next installment. Our advice is to
check out the solid first hour, then bail out for a debriefing over vodka
martinis and Beluga caviar served on toast points. Thus primed, the
discriminating viewer will head for the home theater and a nostalgic,
late-night viewing of the Bond classic, From Russia with Love (1963) on
video. As the ads once exclaimed: Sean Connery is James Bond. That's good
enough for us.
Rated PG-13 for cartoonish violence and insipid sexual double-entendres.
Cinema Uprising copyright C 1999 by Stephen B. Evans. All rights reserved.
This work may not be reproduced or transmitted in any form, by any means,
without the prior, written permission of the author.
The author may be contacted at: evans@cstone.net

Author
Michael Dequina
_The_World_Is_Not_Enough_ (PG-13) ** (out of ****)
Looking at all the hoopla surrounding the latest James Bond adventure
starring Pierce Brosnan, _The_World_Is_Not_Enough_, it's funny to note
that the announcement of Brosnan as the fifth actor to play Agent 007 was
met with a raised eyebrow.  The former Remington Steele was past his
prime, detractors said, and his name did not guarantee an audience. 
Flash forward four years, and Brosnan has proven to be the most popular
Bond since Sean Connery, with his first two efforts, 1995's _GoldenEye_
and 1997's _Tomorrow_Never_Dies_, becoming the highest-grossing 007
adventures in history.  But while those films were both reasonably
diverting entertainments, what they certainly weren't were classics of
its genre (though _GoldenEye_'s deliciously sadomasochistic villainess,
Xenia Onatopp, is one for the hall of fame).
For the first few minutes of _World_, the 19th installment of MGM's
long-running action franchise, it looks as if Brosnan may have found his
defining entry in the series, along the lines of Sean Connery's
_Goldfinger_ and Roger Moore's _The_Spy_Who_Loved_Me_.  The traditional
opening action sequence--which, for once, actually sets up the film's
main plot--is exhilarating, going from a daring escape from an office to
a rip-roaring speedboat chase then finally to an exploding hot air
balloon as Bond pursues a female sniper (_Il_Postino_ sex bomb Maria
Grazia Cucinotta).  After a very clever visual segue, the familiar
silhouetted nude female dancers do their thing to what is easily the best
title tune of the Brosnan Bond era, performed by Garbage.
However, to use the easy pun, _The_World_Is_Not_Enough_ truly is not. 
After an opening that effectively sets up the secret agent's
mission--protect oil heiress Elektra King (Sophie Marceau) from terrorist
Renard (Robert Carlyle), who had kidnapped her years earlier--director
Michael Apted plays things formula-safe.  (This is especially
disappointing considering that it had been hoped, and to some degree been
anticipated, that the drama and documentary filmmaker would bring
something fresh to the series.)  Granted, James Bond films are all about
formula, but it's hard to get worked up over by-the-numbers ski stunts
when, contrary to the famous line, somebody has done it better--Bond
himself, in fact, in the film from which that song came,
_The_Spy_Who_Loved_Me_.  Ditto the submarine-set finale, which evokes an
even stronger sense of dj vu considering that the last Bond film,
_Tomorrow_Never_Dies_, also ended in the water.  The one avenue for
something original--Renard's ever-increasing physical strength and
invulnerability caused by a bullet lodged in his brain--is never
exploited to its fullest potential.
As irksome as the lingering sense of unoriginality is, what makes this
film the hands-down worst of Brosnan's 007 outings can be summed up in
two words: Denise Richards.  In all her previous films, Richards has
already proven to be an attractive screen presence with little talent
underneath.  But familiarity with her unimpressive body of work (as
opposed to her impressive body) does not quite prepare one for her
portrayal of, ahem, nuclear physicist Dr. Christmas Jones--a performance
of Elizabeth Berkley proportions, even when considering the undemanding,
credibility-stretching acting standards of Bond movies.  It's a given
that Richards fails to convince as anyone who's failed a science class,
let alone a scientist; but she fails to be believable as a
flesh-and-blood person, spouting off scientific jargon so robotically
that one wonders how much of the film's huge budget went to her
teleprompters and cue cards.
It's a shame that MGM focused its hype machine on her rather than
Marceau, who is everything Richards isn't.  She is a strong match for
Bond (and Brosnan) in every way, a formidable mix of acting ability,
charisma, beauty, and sex appeal.  Richards may get all the va-va-voom
costumes (such as hotpants, tank tops, and that staple of all nuclear
physicists' travel wardrobes, tight evening gowns), but Marceau scorches
with a simple glance, regardless of what she may be wearing (which, for
the record, mostly consists of robes and seductively draped bedsheets). 
Richards may fit the physical mold of a traditional "Bond girl," but
Marceau is a hot-blooded, full-bodied Bond _woman_--and therein lies all
the difference.
Based on the early grosses, however, _The_World_ appears to be enough
for audiences, who are poised to make this Brosnan's most financially
successful Bond to date--which is just as well, as I suppose, for the
supersuave Brosnan fits the role like a glove, and I would not mind
seeing him in at least one more globe-trotting yarn.  But if the Bond
creative team doesn't get a much-needed dose of creative inspiration any
time soon, the "James Bond will return" tag becomes less of a reassurance
than a threat.
Michael Dequina
twotrey@juno.com | michael_jordan@geocities.com |
jordan_host@sportsmail.com | mrbrown@iname.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site:  http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CinemaReview Magazine:  http://www.CinemaReview.com
on ICQ: #25289934  |  on AOL Instant Messenger: MrBrown23


Author
David N. Butterworth
        The most depressing thing about the depressingly pedestrian James
Bond film "The World is Not Enough" is its final frame: white letters on a
black background proclaiming "James Bond Will Return."  Oh I certainly hope
not.
        With Pierce Brosnan in his third and reportedly last go-round as
James Bond 007, "The World is Not Enough" is the best example to date that
"'Enough" is enough.
        In this, the 19th chapter in the seemingly-endless franchise
featuring Ian Fleming's debonair British secret agent who likes his
martinis--and his nemeses--shaken not stirred, the sub-inspired
screenwriters have chosen to rehash all of the setups, stunts, and sexy
encounters of the previous 18 Bond flicks rather than coming up with
anything the slightest bit original.
        We've got previously-used speedboat chases, ski chases, and sticky
situations aboard nuclear submarines.  We've got a couple of hot-to-trot
babes without an ounce of acting ability between them.  We've got a
post-Cold War megalomaniac bent on world domination slash destruction (here
played by a skinheaded Robert Carlyle with mean, lean panache).  And, as
has been the case since 1977's "The Spy Who Loved Me," we've got a plot
that has nothing whatsoever to do with anything conceived by Mr. Fleming.
        We've also got a main title song by Garbage to which, with very
little effort, you can fit the lyrics to *both* songs from "Tomorrow Never
Dies."
        While originality was never the series' strong suit, the films were
almost always fun, with at least some thought going into the nonstop
stunts.  I can't think of one memorable set-piece in the entire--and very
dull--"The World is Not Enough."
        In addition, Michael Apted (yes, the respected director of such
films as "Coal Miner's Daughter," "Nell," and the "28Up" documentary
series) takes embarrassing advantage of the full range of Bond clichs.
You get the "talking killer" plot device--you know the scenario: the bad
guy has the good guy at his mercy yet waxes poetic just long enough to die
of old age.  And you get a slew of high-priced assassins who can't hit a
barn door at 20 paces: in the film's opening minutes (of an endless 128),
Bond chases a sultry sniper along the Thames and the leather-clad lovely
fails to hit Bond's souped-up "fishing boat" with a bazooka when he pulls
within a few feet of her.  Later, she takes off in a hot air balloon with
Bond dangling from a guy rope beneath her but is still unable to take him
out.
        These reliable absurdities are more frustrating than usual since
there are no distractions other than occasional ads for luxury automobiles,
vodka, or credit cards.
        In and among the rampant product placements, Brosnan grapples with
Carlyle, "Braveheart"'s Sophie Marceau (as former kidnap victim slash
heiress Elektra King; she's terrible), "Wild Things"' Denise Richards (as a
nuclear physicist Lord help me; she's laughable), and Judi Dench as M.
Dame Judi brings the only shred of dignity to a series that has long since
jettisoned its self-respect (about the time Roger Moore inherited Bond's
Walther PPK).
        Brosnan goes through the motions with the grace and charm you'd
expect of the former "Remington Steele" star, but even he has to be
thinking there's more to life than an easy paycheck.  He's given plenty of
wiseacre asides to deliver, but only one of them--"I don't know any doctor
jokes"--made me chuckle (although "I thought Christmas only comes once a
year" is more in keeping with the series' penchant for grown-worthy puns).
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Author
Scott Renshaw
THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH
(MGM)
Starring:  Pierce Brosnan, Sophie Marceau, Robert Carlyle, Denise
Richards, Judi Dench, Robbie Coltrane.
Screenplay:  Neal Purvis & Robert Wade and Bruce Feirstein.
Producers:  Michael G. Wilson and Barbara Broccoli.
Director:  Michael Apted.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  128 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     After 40 years and 19 films, the James Bond series is a cinematic
institution -- perhaps even the last cinematic institution. In a film
industry climate where the object of big-budget movies is generally to
show the audience something new and dazzling, the Bond series is all about
structural stability. You know you'll get a show-stopping stunt sequence
to kick things off. You know that stunt sequence will lead into opening
credits filled with writhing female silhouettes. You the opening credits
will lead into a visit with Q (Desmond Llewelyn). You know Bond will fire
off a few ghastly puns aimed at Q's latest gadgets. Going to a Bond film
is like going to a fast food restaurant. You attend because there's
something comforting about knowing it will taste the same every time. It's
a recipe you don't want to see shaken or stirred.
     In a sense, there's little to say about THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH that
hasn't already been said about the 18 installments that have preceded it.
It goes without saying that Agent 007 (Pierce Brosnan) has a mission that
involves a beautiful woman or two. One of them is Elektra King (Sophie
Marceau), an oil heiress whose pipeline -- and life -- appear to be in
danger; one of them is Dr. Christmas Jones (Denise Richards), a nuclear
weapons expert in a pin-up body. It similarly goes without saying that
there's a villain bent on mass destruction. His name is Renard (Robert
Carlyle), a terrorist-for-hire who has been rendered impervious to pain by
a bullet to the medulla oblongata. And it goes without saying that the
clock is ticking on a dastardly plan involving the very fate of the free
world (or at least Istanbul), and that only Bond can save us.
     It does bear mentioning that THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH turns out to be
a frustrating combination of the all-too-common and the distractingly
absent. The film does open with a rousing pre-credits chase sequence
involving motorboats racing down the Thames. When Bond leaps from a boat
sailing through the air, catching the dangling rope on a hot air balloon
in the process, there's hope that director Michael Apted can maintain that
sort of high-flying absurdity. Then the wearying deja vu begins to set
in. How many times can we thrill to Bond fleeing gunmen while skiing? How
many times can a shootout in a place where every inanimate object explodes
be interesting? How many times can you wring excitement from getting
caught underwater without air? To Apted's credit, he does find a slick new
twist when he threatens Bond with a helicopter armed with a massive
clearcutting saw. Far more often, the perfunctory thrice-hourly action
sequences are just there to remind you that you're watching a Bond film.
     Sometimes the reminder is necessary, because THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH 
is otherwise short on traditional Bond texture. The film may trot out
locations in Spain, Kazakhstan, Azerbaijan and Turkey, but it never does
anything with them, denying us the welcome pleasure of Bond film as exotic
travelogue. Sophie Marceau and Denise Richards, scrumptious though they
may be, are a major come-down from the magnetism of TOMORROW NEVER DIES'
Michelle Yeoh. Most disappointing of all is Renard, who may be the least
commanding villain the series has ever seen. It's bad enough that he gets
only a few scenes to develop any kind of personality; it's inexcusable
that he turns out to be a self-pitying lap dog for the real villain
pulling the strings. Mix in the absence of a suitably unstoppable nasty
henchman (are the Oddjobs and Jaws's of the post-Cold War world so hard to
come by?), and you've got a pretty vanilla thrilla.
     It is enjoyable to watch Pierce Brosnan growing into the role of Bond
so comfortably. Connery enthusiasts may cringe, but I believe Brosnan is
the best all-around Bond yet -- no one else has combined such convincing
licensed-to-kill menace with a bon vivant twinkle in the eye. He's still a
presence worth watching, as are Dame Judi Dench (in a meatier-than-usual
role for M) and John Cleese (bringing his exquisite comic timing to Q's
maladroit assistant). But when the best thing about a Bond film is the
acting, you know something isn't right. Perhaps I've reached a point in my
movie-going life where a Bond film is a no-win proposition. THE WORLD is
not enough -- not enough creativity, and not enough welcome nostalgia
value. Even for fast food, the familiar tastes too familiar, and the
unfamiliar just tastes wrong.

Author
Homer Yen
The latest installment in one of the most durable
franchises in Hollywood history has been released. 
And by now, either you've seen it or you've already
made up your mind to pass on James Bond's latest
escapade.  If you've decided to pass, you're probably
making the correct choice.  `The World Is Not Enough'
has all of the ingredients that make for a fun Bond
film, but it lacks spark and ingenuity.  
Before I bring out the three major weaknesses of this
film, I do want to say that the Bond formula has
worked again and again for a couple of reasons.  Bond
films are not about character development or an
absorbing story line.  It's about the beautiful women,
the exotic locations, amazing gadgets, sexual humor,
and breathtaking action sequences.  In the beginning
of this film, there is a terrific water chase through
the Thames River that probably ranks as one of the
best beginning sequences among all of the bond films.
This chase occurs because of a bombing that has
occurred within MI6 Headquarters (home of the British
Secret Service).  The victim in the accident is a
wealthy business tycoon who is in the midst of
constructing a new pipeline from Russia to Europe.  It
is vital that this pipeline be completed to help
ensure the West's supply of oil for the coming
millenium.  Now, his daughter, Electra, must take
control to finish the project (Sophie Marceau).  But
there are plenty of people that would like to see this
project fail.  The British Ministry, headed by `M'
(Judi Dench), believes that the person most capable of
carrying out such a plan is the baleful Reynard
(Robert Carlisle), a rogue KGB agent.  In the process
of protecting Electra, Bond meets up with the nubile
Dr. Christmas Jones (Denise Richards).  Why is her
name Christmas?  I think that the only reason is so
that the film can end with one of those silly
double-entendres.  She's a nuclear scientist, and her
importance remains unclear until at some point in the
film a nuclear warhead is stolen.  This is an abrupt
turn of events, but true Bond fans should be able to
stay the course.  Others who are not as devoted will
instead laugh every time Dr. Jones speaks about the
internal workings of a bomb (which is what happened in
my theatre).  She's less convincing as a scientist
than a bed pet for Bond.
Up to this point, I'm only enthused for the first 20
or 30 minutes of the film.  Then the energy of the
film begins to wane.  Why is that?  Here are those
three weaknesses.  1)  There is no wacky, evil
sidekick.  The best spy films have a cool sidekick
like Oddjob, Jaws, or even Mini-Me.  2)  The women are
nothing but pretty pin-up posters.  In the last film,
they were smart to introduce the karate-kicking
Michelle Yeoh.  Here, Denise Richards didn't seem like
a necessary addition to the cast.  Meanwhile, Sophie
Marceau, while adequate, couldn't punch her way out of
a bag.  3)  Brosnan was excellent in the sophisticated
remake, `The Thomas Crown Affair.'  Judi Dench is an
Oscar-winning actress.  Robert Carlisle is a great
actor whose credits include `Trainspotting' and `The
Full Monty.'  Here, they are tremendously
underutilized.
Let's face it.  James Bond is not great detective.  He
lucks his way in and out of situations that gets him
closer to his final encounter.  Guns equipped with
laser sights still manage to miss him and despite his
need to be covert, he always smugly gives out his real
name as Bond, James Bond.  Watching 007's exploits is
a guilty pleasure through and through.  


Author
Curtis Edmonds
The James Bond movies are sometimes described as formulaic, but that's
not quite right.  A formula is more exact, more scientific.  You mix so
many cubic centimeters of one substance with so many milliliters of
another substance and you get the same number of joules or watts or
whatever-it-is every time.  Bond movies are a lot more like recipes.
You have the same ingredients every time, but if the ingredients are
stale or you have too much of one thing and not enough of another,
whatever it is you're cooking doesn't taste right.
Here, in The World is Not Enough, most of the ingredients are there for
a successful Bond movie.  In fact, you can almost run them down in a
checklist -- Roger Ebert did exactly that in his Chicago Sun-Times
review, in fact.  We've got Brosnan as the best Bond of the decade, the
redoubtable Dame Judith Dench as M, the new Iron Lady of the United
Kingdom, and the winsome Samantha Bond as Moneypenny in the front
office.  John Cleese joins Q (Desmond Llewellyn) in the gadget shop
(although the bad guys have the best gadget, a helicopter chain saw
thingy that can even deal with the titanium armor on Bond's BMW).  The
clever product placements are still around (including a Visa card that
gets Bond everywhere he wants to be).  The sultry Sophie Marceau, whose
only fault is that she is not Elizabeth Hurley, steams up the screen
quite nicely as the Bond Girl.  The chase scenes are here, too, but
they're nothing special.  An imaginative race inside an oil pipeline is
the best of them.
Only one ingredient is missing from the Bond recipe here, and it's
arguably the most important.  The Bond villain is, at least in my
cookbook, the key spice that makes the recipe work.  Without a
compelling bad guy to be Bond's foil, the movie doesn't work as well.
Take away the bad guy, and 007 might just as well spend the movie doing
paperwork.
The bad guy in The World is Not Enough is a schmuck.  His name is
Renard, (Robert Carlyle) and he has a bullet in his brain.  Apparently,
the bullet is destroying the part of his brain that makes him feel
pain.  One wonders, though, if the bullet also hit the part of his brain
that makes him interesting.  Sure, he can hold hot rocks in his hand,
and he has a cool scar, but he's got no charisma, and takes no joy in
his evil work.  Most Bond villains are over-the-top, but Renard is about
a hundred feet under the top and sinking fast.  He's supposed to be a
nihilistic terrorist, which should be interesting, but he's so blah and
dull that he might as well be a crazed accountant.  (Brad Pitt's
character from Fight Club would be a welcome relief in this part.)
A better bad guy would have added to the movie immensely by
counterbalancing some of the more ridiculous aspects of the movie --
that is, the plot.  The plot is dreadful -- not interesting enough to be
fun, just complicated enough to give you a headache.  And the
complications aren't there for any good reason.  Like the nonsense about
the Trade Federation at the start of the new Star Wars movie, the plot
is just there to stitch the action sequences together.
It is arguable that the victory of Ronald Reagan and Margaret Thatcher
and the West in the Cold War deprived James Bond movies of good plots.
I think it runs deeper than that, though.  The world today is still a
scary place, even without the Soviets.  But the scariness comes from
many different parts of the world, most of which we're not familiar
with.  (The World is Not Enough spends a lot of time in the former
Soviet republics of Azerbaijan and Kazakhstan -- and manages, somehow,
to make believe that Baku is the Russian Riviera, complete with casinos
and fancy villas.)  And the geopolitical scariness is of a different
order -- cyberterrorism and biological warfare and the like -- that the
Bonds of this world are ill-equipped to deal with.  It ought not to be
that much of a stretch to come up with some plausible way to blow up the
world, but the writers here can't figure it out.
The other flaws in the movie show up as well.  Denise Richards is not
given much to do as the second Bond Girl, and despite her supposed
status as a rocket scientist (insert joke here), she's just given
master-of-the-obvious lines like "The ship is flooding!"  (She's given
one line of Russian -- which I could actually follow, meaning that her
character has the same bad accent and poor grasp of Russian that I do.)
Bond is given a shoulder injury that only manifests itself when he is in
the clutches of the bad guys.  Robbie Coltrane, who would have made a
fine replacement of Q, is only marginally effective as Bond's ally in
the Russian Mafia.  The opening chase scene is dull and overlong -- so
much so that the credits seem out of place, almost as if Monty Python
were doing the editing.
Anyone who has ever tried to replicate their grandmother's stuffing for
Thanksgiving will sympathize with The World is Not Enough:  a good
recipe gone wrong.  This holiday season, James Bond has served up a
turkey.
Movie Reviews:
http://www.hsbr.org/buzz/reviewer/reviews/bdreviews.html
http://www.epinions.com/user-curtisedmonds
"Oh, if life were like the movies, I'd never be blue."
    -- Alan Jackson, "Here In The Real World"

Author
Eugene Novikov
 "Why can't you just say 'hello,' like a normal person?"
Starring Pierce Brosnan, Sophie Marceau, Robert Carlyle, Denise
Richards, Judi Dench. Rated PG-13.
Why can't James Bond just say "hello" like a normal person instead of
the cocky "The name is Bond, James Bond" staple? I don't think people
get a kick out of it anymore. Instead of eliciting knowing nods, it
produces lame chuckles. It's worn out and it needs to go the way of
Timothy Dalton. As a matter of fact, it's not the only thing that needs
to be eliminated from Bond's repertoire. I move for all trademark
phrases to be erased. That means buh-bye, "Martini, shaken, not
stirred." No more "talking killer." Here's a franchise desperately in
need of a reworking, and I don't mean erasing all sentimental value and
making a conventional thriller. I mean completely original, more tongue-
in-cheek humorand less self-importance. After 19 installments, the old
tradition is wearing thin.
Bond's latest escapade, uncleverly titled The World is Not Enough, runs
through all the regular conventions -- catch phrases, bodacious babes,
bad puns, et al -- except they aren't as much fun. The maniacal
supervillain this time around is Renard (Robert Carlyle), an aspiring
oil tycoon with a bullet embedded in his cranium. The bullet makes him
immune to pain and while it will eventually kill him, he grows stronger
and stronger until the day he dies. His evil plan for world domination
involves taking over a pipeline owned by the sexy Elektra (Sophie
Marceau) whose father was just killed in a bombing at Bond's
headquarters.
007 is dispatched by head honcho M (the formidable Judi Dench, playing
my favorite character in the series) to help Elektra, but whether she
actually needs help is debatable. Is she really the good girl she seems
to be? Or does she have an ulterior motive in this risky endeavor. Any
guesses? Anyone?
Things get personal when Renard kidnaps M. Rescuing her becomes Bond's
highest priority and he enlists the help of a gorgeous nuclear
physicist named Christmas Jones (Denise Richards, and by the way, where
do you get off saying a women is not interested in men at all and then
have her wear shorts above the thigh and revealing tanktops? Oh, never
mind, this is a Bond movie. I get it now. Beg your pardon.) to diffuse
the bomb Renard has planted in the pipeline and get to the place where
he's stashed away Bond's beloved boss.
This is the same old stuff except the camp value has all but
disappeared, the action isn't as exciting and the puns get lamer every
second. Director Michael Apted (responsible for, along with about 40
other movies, Nell and Gorillas in the Mist; this is, however, his
first crack at a 007 feature), who's a film veteran if ever there was
one, doesn't inject the movie with enough life; the action, with the
exception of one scene involving a bomb and a quickly moving
contraption inside a pipeline, seems perfunctory and mundane. For all
the flaws of Tomorrow Never Dies, at least that installment, helmed by
Roger Spottiswoode, had its share of exhilirating chase sequences and
inventive gadgetry. The World is Not Enough doesn't even have any cool
new Bond gizmos to amuse us with.
Pierce Brosnan is no Sean Connery, but he is one of the better things
about this movie. Charming and charismatic, I'd have to say he is the
best Bond since Connery left the scene to pursue romantic film
relations with women about 1/3 his age. Sophie Marceau and Denise
Richards are both fairly atrocious though, and while a good Bond goes
along way, he can't pull the whole movie out of the water when it's
desperately drowning.
When Bond was resurrected in 1995 with Goldeneye, the world accepted it
because of what can only be called the novelty of the old. People went
six years without Bond and all the old Bond traditions brought back to
life seemed new and cool again. Now that's worn off and the MGM
franchise is in need of some new life. Keep Brosnan. Change everything
else.

Author
Gary Jones
The World Is Not Enough is a James Bond film. The rest of this review is
optional reading, since you now know all you need to.
The film, the third in the series to star Pierce Brosnan as 007, is the
familiar mix of outrageous globe-trotting action, eye-popping gadgets
and unfeasibly beautiful girls. The plot is hardly worth mentioning
since you've seen it 18 times before, the traditional lunatic villain
played this time by Robert Carlyle. The whole thing is utterly barmy,
but if we accept that the best the Bond series can offer is a silly but
stylish romp, then James Bond XIX succeeds as well as any of its
predecessors. 
We know what to expect from a Bond film, and the production team has to
balance the need to deliver the goods against the danger of the formula
becoming stale. There never was a time when the Bond films were
realistic - they have always taken place in a world constructed in the
fantasies of teenage boys, so the film-makers also have to preserve
Bond's timeless quality yet make the film relevant to a modern audience.
The team behind this Bond have got it just about right. Director Michael
Apted is better known for his documentaries and character-based films
such as 'Nell' and 'Gorillas In the Mist', and he handles this change of
pace well, although much of the credit should probably go to editor Jim
Clark and second unit director Vic Armstrong.
Pierce Brosnan is at least the second-best Bond there's been, but it's
probably sacrilege to even suggest he might be better than you-know-who.
He brings a cool, suave viciousness back to the role that went out of
fashion for a decade or two but can work again in our ironic post-
feminist post-modernist post-everything world.
There are three main female characters. We are meant to believe that
Christmas Jones (Denise Richards) is a physicist helping to dismantle
nuclear weapons in the wastes of a former Soviet republic, but our
credulity is severely tested by her jaw-dropping Lara Croft costume
which barely contains her jaw-dropping Lara Croft figure. Given the
concentration demanded of the work she and her male colleagues are
carrying out, her T-shirt would surely have been banned on grounds of
safety. Pleasing on the eye though Dr. Jones is, she is a depressing
throwback to the Bond bimbos of the past, and like the character she
plays, Denise Richards is pretty but pretty useless. Thank goodness for
Elektra King (Sophie Marceau), a much better-drawn and more complex
female character than those 007 usually encounters. The other leading
lady, and the classiest of the lot, is the wonderful Judi Dench, who in
her third outing as M gets more involved in the action that the
character ever has before.
Despite its lapses into some unfortunate features of Bondage past, The
World Is Not Enough confirms that the dismal days of the later Roger
Moore films are now just a bad memory, and the franchise that once
seemed culturally if not financially bankrupt is once again in good
shape. But then again, it is just a Bond film.
-- 
Gary Jones 
Homepage: www.bohr.demon.co.uk
PGP public key available from servers (DH/DSS key ID: 0x11EAE903)

Author
Walter Frith
There are 20 James Bond movies counting 'The World Is Not Enough'.  Sean
Connery certainly has been the best Bond.  In fact, not a single
disagreement has come up when I discuss this with other people.  Connery's
combination of rugged timing, the smooth delivery of his lines and his
ability to woo women make him the ultimate lover AND fighter.  As the 20th
century closes out shortly, here's how the Bond franchise breaks down and
the actors who have played him.
You can even say there are 21 Bond films if you count 1967's 'Casino
Royale'.
'The World Is Not Enough' is vintage James Bond.  It resembles the old days
when Bond movies had great sub plots and a diverse number of characters,
including the variety of beautiful women who have been central to the plot.
Since the Bond films have resembled romance novels, comic books, car ads,
travel brochures and liquor spots, you would think that enough is enough.
But the films are addictive.  They are alluring to the most avid movie fan
and while some have failed in recent memory, such as the badly edited and
music style video presentation of 'Tomorrow Never Dies', it is always fun to
see how bad or good the next one will be.
Terrorism and revenge are the ingredients in 'The World Is Not Enough'.
James Bond (Pierce Brosnan) becomes involved with a beautiful socialite
named Elektra King (Sophie Marceau in a surprisingly good performance) who
wants to build a large pipeline across Asia and needs protection from having
it destroyed by her rivals.  Bond also locks horns with a terrorist named
Renard (Robert Carlyle, the skinny stripper with the son in 'The Full
Monty') who has a bullet lodged in his brain which is slowly killing him.
But for now, he has lost a couple of his senses, including the sense of
touch which makes him seemingly invincible since he can't feel pain.  There
is also a nuclear scientist named Dr. Christmas Jones (Denise Richards) who
is the film's most annoying character and couldn't possibly survive
physically in the real world but manages to hold her own with Bond in the
movies.
Elektra was kidnapped by Renard many years ago and has a past with him.  She
was sort of brain washed and mentally drawn to him by the whole ordeal and
her loyalty may or not be to him as Bond finds out throughout the course of
the film.  A lot of intriguing thrillers have a complicated plot not easy to
follow and this James Bond installment has many cleverly interwoven plots
and sub plots with stories all on a collision course with one another.  It's
the best Bond film I've seen since 1983's 'Octopussy' which was the best one
featuring Roger Moore.
Other characters who return are "M" (Judi Dench), "Q" (Desmond Llewelyn).
Replacing "Q", who is retiring, is "R" (John Cleese, and he serves up the
gimmicks this time which are the contraptions that save Bond when he gets
into a jam.  Some of them this time are quite ingenious from any other
gadgets we've seen in a very long while.
Directed by the under rated Michael Apted and written by Neil Purvis, Robert
Wade and Bruce Feirstein, 'The World Is Not Enough' has good character
development, funny moments and all the trappings of early Bond.  In fact,
those who may not have seen one in over thirty years would never know how
diverse the series has been by viewing this one now.  It's a return to its
original roots.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Jon Popick
PLANET SICK-BOY: http://www.sick-boy.com
The world is not enough indeed.  The latest James Bond flick falls as
flat as Tomorrow Never Dies, with decent action sequences and bad soap
opera acting.  Here, 007 (Pierce Brosnan, The Thomas Crown Affair) tries
to quell  get this  a terrorist with a nuclear warhead.  Yawn - now
there's something we haven't seen before.
The nineteenth film in the longest-running series in the history of
cinema kicks off with the familiar JB opening and music before settling
in Bilboa, Spain, where Bond is calmly dealing with a crooked Swiss
banker.  Of course, the situation comes to a head, and Bond is involved
with an impressive boat chase that not only runs through the streets of
London, but wraps up on a hot-air balloon before launching into the sexy
opening credits and new 007 song from Garbage.  Why do songs from Bond
films always sound the same?
Bond's initial assignment is to recover money stolen from a Sir Robert
King, which leads him to become involved with King's leggy daughter
Elektra (Sophie Marceau, Lost & Found).  Elektra is currently building a
huge oil pipeline in her native Azerbaijan, and Bond believes that her
life may be threatened by a devious terrorist named Renard (Robert
Carlyle, Plunkett & Macleane).  Renard, previously a target of MI6, has
a bullet lodged in his medulla oblongotta, which renders him unable to
feel pain.
As goofy as that sounds, Bond also gets involved with a buxom nuclear
physicist named Christmas Jones (Denise Richards, Drop Dead Gorgeous, in
a bit of awful casting).  But wait until the point in the movie where
they say that Elektra is only twenty-one.  If she is twenty-one, then
Dr. Jones must be around thirteen.  On the plus side  other than
getting to watch two attractive women try to act  there are two
fantastic one-liners about Christmas' name at the end of the film.  I
was getting nervous that the screenwriters dubbed her `Christmas' and
forgot to make fun of the name.  Jones is Bond's third lay of the film,
after Elektra and the MI6 doctor Molly Warmflesh, whom 007 poles in
order to regain his active duty status.  He probably just missed a
fourth in Il Postino's Maria Grazia Cucinotta, but she escaped his
sexual grasp in the film's opening.
The script is another example of a bad action film with too many
writers.  Sure, all the bad double-entendres and one-liners are still
there, but what was the deal with John Cleese (The Out-of-Towners)
playing the successor to Q (Desmond Llewelyn)?  You almost feel sorry
for people as talented as Robby Coltrane (Message in a Bottle), who
again plays Valentin Dimitreveych Zukovsky, and Dame Judi Dench, who
reprises her role as M in a healthy supporting role with more screen
time than her Oscar-winning turn as Queen Elizabeth in Shakespeare in
Love.  And as soon as you see Denise Richards in a white tank top, you
know that chilly water will figure into the film at some point.
Directed by Michael Apted (Extreme Measures), Enough was filmed by
Adrian Biddle (The Butcher Boy) on location in several European
countries.  The action scenes are barely enough to keep viewers
interested (aside from the early boat chase) and the final fight between
Bond and Renard is completely anti-climactic.  You would expect Bond in
a battle against a guy that can't feel pain to be a lot more
interesting.  But, then again, you would expect the whole film to be a
lot more interesting.  I've had Enough.
2:08 - PG-13 for intense sequences of action violence, some sexuality
and innuendo

Author
Indra Moeljadi
The World Is Not Enough a.k.a. James Bond XIX
Well, another James Bond movie. Still with Pierce Brosnan, but this time
with Sophie Marceau and Denise Richards making it to the well-known
Bond-girls list. A James Bond movie isn't a James Bond movie without these
elements: explosions, beautiful babe, James driving a car, Q's gadgets,
casino scene, Martini "shaken not stirred", another beautiful babe, guns,
dangerous action, bombs, an a whacky villain. And it's the same with this
one. It has all those elements, so it's a complete JB-movie.
If you have seen the last JB movies, especially those with Pierce Brosnan,
than the plot is much or less the same. Only this time, M (James' boss) gets
involved personally. Actually I don't feel like telling you the plot,
because a James Bond movie always have the same plot.
The opening scene was cool, because of the shots of the Millenium Dome. And
a lot of other action scenes, but at some point I experienced some dejavu,
like I already saw that stunt in an earlier JB. Maybe I did, maybe I didn't.
In any case, the name is still "Bond, James Bond".
If you're a big JB fan then go. Why bother reading this review anyway? If
you're not a big fan, go see it if you have spare time and money, which most
of you have on Christmas anyway. But if you hate this guy, then don't go.
After I saw this movie, I was walking to my car. In the background Annie
Lennox was singing "Hey, hey, I saved the world today...". In my opinion,
that song would have been way way better than Garbage.
Indra Moeljadi
is saving all his money to buy a BMW Z8 after failing to buy a Z3

Author
Alex Ioshpe
I am extremely sorry to disappoint you, but although the latest addition to
the Bond-films is still entertaining, it is "not enough" to impress the
awaiting fans. The series is obviously showing its age. Even James Bond
can't survive 19 returns to the big screen.
James Bond is the world's most famous secret agent. Highly trained, suave
and sophisticated, James Bond has a license to kill, as indicated by the
"00" before the "7". In past missions, Bond has been into space, under the
oceans and even driven around the streets of St. Petersburg in a tank.
Tomorrow Never Dies revealed a Bond that was happiest blazing machine guns,
and grinning at his gadgets which, as many fans have pointed out, is in
complete contrast to the man Fleming originally envisaged. However, The
World Is Not Enough has a surprise in store for us. The scriptwriters have
decided to delve deeper into Bond's character, making him more vulnerable
than before, and have decided to make a more realistic, gritty film.
Bond's assignment for TWINE is to protect Electra King (Sopie Marceau) from
Renard () whilst she oversees the construction of the oil pipeline. He gets
to go skiing, spends a greater amount of screen time with M (Judy Dench)
than usual and above all, utters the immortal "Bond....James Bond" while a
huge explosion rips through a building behind him. Brosnan, 46, who played
the famous agent since "Golden Eye", is quoted as not enjoying working on
the previous Bond film, Tomorrow Never Dies, saying, "The last one was a bit
like pulling teeth. This one's been like an old pair of shoes. "
In the days of Sean Connery Bond-films were always ahead of their time. Q's
inventions that were presented were therefore both innovative and
entertaining. Those inventions, Connery's charm and the humorous, some times
even self-ironic elements made those films both light and easy watchable
films that served as pure entertainment.
Michael Apted promissed a deeper story and specatcular action, but he can't
expect to dazzle the modern audience with the action scenes presented in
"..Not Enough", because they seem pale compared with science fiction- and
action films released by the hundreds every year, where the effects and
action of one were surpassed by the next.
His film is at times entertaining, but it is not James Bond; it's a common
action film that doesn't present any interesting material. The famous James
Bond-formula is not intact: the bad-guy in the story is not evil or sinister
enough. He doesn't have any scary bodyguards or unstoppable agents. He
doesn't seem like a man that is powerful and dangerous enough to change the
world. Apted added a softer side to his character, making him more
vulnerable. That makes the impression even worth. Bond-films can be compared
with fairytales and have a similar formula. It is therefore necessary to
have simple, but not primitive characters. There have to be bad-guys that
are both clever, powerful and evil beyond belief, so that they seem
threatening and at first glance impossible for our hero to conquer.
 By adding a softer side to the evil bad-guy, the director is attempting to
create a more real and three-dimensional character. This is completely
unnecessary and seems out of place in a film like this. An attempt to take
all the enormous exaggerations in this film seriously would be impossible,
and jet Apted's changed and unstable atmosphere doesn't make it possible to
laugh at the action or events presented, nor enjoy the movie as a typical
light and humorous extravaganza.  The total outcome of this is that the
characters and their interrelations seem unfinished, simplified and unreal.
The success of Bond-films throughout the years has been self-irony. An
attempt to take the story more seriously can actually ruin the whole
picture - that has always been the most important ingreediance in the
formula. Our hero survives explosions, rains of bullets, car chases and
comes dry out of water after chasing a submarine. The beautiful and tempting
women, the dangerous missions and Q's "practical" inventions are all
present. But although the locations are frequently changing, moving from
London to Kazakhstan, from the height of the snowy Alps to the depth of the
ocean, the suspense element is somehow gone and there is no particular story
between the action sequences.
And then there is the acting. Pierce Brosnan is worth a notice, but he
remains nothing more than an acceptable Bond, especially when compared with
Sean Connery. The major problems in the script make Bond's character seem
underwritten. What was intended as an improvement of his character, by
adding more emotions and vulnerability, results in confusion, unsure acting,
unfinished relationships and unsteady direction. Sophie Marceau on the other
hand is very impressive, partly because of her talent and appearance, partly
because her character is the best written and meaningful in the film,
responsible for the one and only surprising twist in the story. Judy Dench
is playing the first female leader in the history of British Intelligence -
a woman that is both strong and powerful. Dench makes most of her
underwritten character, but it's a pity that one of the most interesting
characters in the story is undeveloped. A dose of really bad acting comes
from Dennise Richards. There has to be more than a well shaped body and a
lab coat  to convince me that she is a scientist.
The previous Bond-films were known for their humor and amusing appearance.
The secret is exaggeration in plot and action sequences. By crossing the
line, and go beyond what most people find believable, the directors obtain
that element of self-parody that these movies are known for. "..Not Enough"
begins swell with the kind of stunts that made Bond famous; the impressive
musical score and staggering credits, but as the events are progressing, it
becomes less interesting and duller for every minute. Apted's exaggerations
are too extreme and neither funny nor innovative. Because of the confusing
atmosphere in the film, we are not sure whether to take this seriously or
just laugh, it is impossible to do neither. The humor is instead turned into
several jokes, provided by  Robbie Coltrane, a character that  is very
similar to the characters created by the Disney company in their animated
films, invented for one purpose - comic relief.
Those jokes, the well tuned musical score, impressive locations and a dose
of amusing acting from Sophie Marceau and Robbie Coltrane elevate the film
to the average level of what we are used to watch. To make a long story
short,"The World Is Not Enough" seems more like an extinction of the Bond
series than a recycling of it.


Author
Shay Casey
Year: 1999.
Starring Pierce Brosnan, Sophie Marceau, Robert Carlyle, Denise Richards,
Robbie Coltrane, Judi Dench, Desmond Llewelyn, John Cleese, Samantha Bond.
Written by Neal Purvis, Robert Wade, and Bruce Feirstein.
Directed by Michael Apted.
Rated PG-13.
When viewing a Bond film, it's extremely hard for a critic to look at it
objectively. For example, all the things I would normally criticize another
movie for (like predictability, clichs, and lousy dialogue) just don't seem
to apply. Nor does it seem to matter that the latest Bond flick, "The World
Is Not Enough," seems a whole lot like every other Bond flick that's been
made. Most other films of this genre are damaged by the audience's overt
familiarity with the subject matter, but Bond only seems strengthened by it.
Let's face it: 007 cannot be judged by normal standards. Is this fair? No,
but it's true. We want to see James Bond do all the things he's been doing
for the better of three decades. Here, he delivers. We get stunts, femme
fatales, nutty gadgets, and a nearly incomprehensible twisting plot that is
of little consequence. This, the 19th installment of the 007 series, proves
that the British charmer still has life left in him.
The plot (though I'm still not sure of it) deals with Renard (Robert
Carlyle), a mysterious terrorist who is trying to steal a nuclear bomb
(natch) after assassinating a good friend of M (Judi Dench). Determined to
have the terrorist brought to justice, M begins a worldwide manhunt and
assigns Bond (Pierce Brosnan) to protect the dead man's daughter, Elektra
King (Sophie Marceau). She and the villain had a prior history, as Renard
had kidnapped Elektra years earlier, only to have her escape before he could
collect the ransom money from her father. Bond tracks down Renard as he is
about to steal the bomb from some nuclear scientists, the leader of which is
Dr. Christmas Jones (Denise Richards, and no jokes about the name). The
villain has an interesting quirk: a bullet in his brain is slowly killing
him, but as it burrows in further, it makes him stronger and impervious to
pain. (Do not try this at home.) Once the bomb is taken, all Bond has to do
is get the girl, kill the bad guy, and save the world. No problem, right?
A real strong point of "The World Is Not Enough" is the acting (with one
major exception). I think it's safe to say that Pierce Brosnan feels very
comfortable in his role, and he is now pulling off Bond with suave charm. He
's a different kind of Bond. Low-key and reserved, he doesn't mug for the
cameras, but lets the persona speak for itself. Considering how long the
character has been around (this being the 19th film and all), this is a
valid approach. Brosnan's Bond definitely knows who he is, but he doesn't
flaunt it. It's because of Brosnan's confident performance that the
screenplay's many self-referencing inside jokes and uncharacteristically
raunchy sexual humor come off so well. Brosnan understands that when the
one-liners are purposely over-the-top, they must be played with a straight
face, and he does so.
The rest of the cast is game enough. Desmond Llewelyn returns for possibly
the final time as Q, and he's brought along a younger replacement, naturally
referred to as "R" and played by John Cleese. R's scenes are priceless, as
Cleese reprises his upper-class bumbler of Monty Python and Fawlty Towers
fame. Robert Carlyle plays the villain with aplomb, but should have been
given more to do (his supposed super-strength never really comes into play).
Robbie Coltrane appears as a carryover character from "GoldenEye" and lights
up every scene he's in. I suppose Judi Dench could never be considered a
"Bond girl," but this time M is given a whole lot more to do, as her
character now has a personal stake in the proceedings. As could be expected,
more Dench is a good thing. Her M is strong and resourceful, a nice addition
to the old formula.
And what about those Bond girls? There are two of them, Sophie Marceau and
Denise Richards. Marceau's performance is actually pretty good for a Bond
character. She exchanges witty banter with Brosnan and is more than up to
the task. She is certainly attractive (as Bond girls must be), but she's
also a good actress, and a touch above what might be expected of her.
Marceau definitely shines, but the weak link in the cast is clearly Denise
Richards. I was unaware that Bond dialogue was terribly difficult to say,
but Richards manages to stumble over nearly every line. Yes, her breasts are
large. Yes, she looks good in a tank top and shorts. (Regular nuclear
physicist attire, I'm sure. Check your common sense at the door for a Bond
flick.) Unfortunately, any and all sexual attraction is ruined when she
opens her mouth and talks like she's on "Dawson's Creek." It doesn't matter
how wet her shirt gets if every line she speaks makes the audience wince,
and keeping the exact same facial expression whether she's speaking a line
like "Hello, how are you?" or "I have to diffuse that nuclear bomb!" doesn't
help. Somebody needed to tell her that she's exchanging lines with James
Bond, not James Van Der Beek.
Richards-bashing aside, this film has a whole lot going for it. The action
sequences are fun. We open with a motorboat chase, and proceed with a ski
chase, a race through an oil pipeline, and the standard sinking-submarine
bit to top it off. All are loads of fun. Completely improbable, but fun
nonetheless. (I do, for example, enjoy the random gasoline barrels placed to
explode at any moment.) "The World Is Not Enough" also possesses a
better-than-average Bond script, which doesn't mean the plot is any more
coherent, but the dialogue is spicier than normal. After Mike Myers' two
"Austin Powers" films, it's hard not to poke fun at the conventions Bond has
been perpetuating for the last 30 years. This latest installment does that
early and often, alluding to 007's penchant for wine, women, and massive
property damage. Fortunately, the film does this without becoming too
farcical, mainly because director Michael Apted shows a certain reverence
for the Bond traditions. He plays it straight, without allowing too much
winking self-parody. It's a pleasing combination.
Is "The World Is Not Enough" the best Bond film ever? Probably not, though I
'm not terribly qualified to make the decision, having only seen a handful
of them. Still, it will probably be enjoyable to both fans and those
unfamiliar with the Bond series. With smashing action, a game cast, and
snappy dialogue, this film is a fun globe-trotting romp. It's got just about
everything you could want from a Bond movie, and it's one of the most purely
entertaining movies I've seen this year.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Author
Jamey Hughton
Starring-Pierce Brosnan, Sophie Marceau, Robert Carlyle,
Denise Richards, Judi Dench and Robbie Coltrane
Director-Michael Apted
Rated PG
For the nineteenth entry in his forever cherished franchise, James Bond
has pulled nothing particularly special out of his hat. At first glimpse
of the dashing new Bond girls, the wildly implausible action sequences
and the nifty Bond gadgets, dedicated 007 fans may dismiss `The World is
Not Enough' as merely same old. Fortunately though, in terms of
boisterous rollicking action, you still know what name to turn to.
In his third outing as the suave and sophisticated superspy, Pierce
Brosnan appears to be even more lightweight and comfortable than
previously evident. Cool and refined, he portrays Bond more solidly and
compact than any actor since Sean Connery. In the opening sequence, Bond
pursues a female sniper in an exhilarating boat race that covers water
and (*ahem*) land. Later on, he evades parachuting villains on ski-doos
while skiing down a treacherous mountainside (`See you back at the
lodge' he quips, as an unfortunate attacker plummets off the side of the
mountain). The action sequences and set-pieces of `The World is Not
Enough' are loaded with top-drawer inventiveness, bursting with
merciless excitement at every turn.
It also must be noted that the film has some mediocre aspects. The plot
is lumpy and uneven and certain characters are put to perpetual waste.
The plot follows Bond as he travels to protect Elektra King (Sophie
Marceau), the daughter of a deceased billionaire who was invested in the
world oil business. Elektra is believed to be the next target of the
devious Russian terrorist Renard (Robert Carlyle), who has a bullet
lodged in his medulla oblongata that renders him completely impervious
to pain. The bald-headed Renard was voted the #1 Bond villain in a
recent pole. But despite the initial possibilities of such a cool
physical attribute, director Michael Apted ignores the strengths of
Carlyle's considerable talent, presenting Renard as a bit of a wuss. I
was hoping for more, to say the least.
Returning characters add spice to this unspectacular entry. Academy
Award-winner Judi Dench returns as M, and once again she positively
showcases the character's authority. Robbie Coltrane reprises his role
from `Goldeneye', playing a plump turkey of a villain named Valentin
Zukovsky, who's so likable it's hard to classify him as a villain. On a
more dramatic note, the legendary weapons-maker Q (Desmond Llewelyn) is
retiring after appearing in (nearly) every Bond movie since 1963's `From
Russia With Love'. The good news: he is being replaced by John Cleese,
playing the younger protg R (get it?). Cleese is a funny man, although
here he is given only a few precious moments of screen and one or two
good lines (one of them being when he describes the attachments on
Bond's new BMW, adding it contains `six beverage cup holders').
`The World is Not Enough' is strictly formula Bond, granted, it's a
formula that is still fun. One great scene has the spy evading a
helicopter wielding three oversized buzzsaws. And of course, Bond is
given his usual quota of witty punch lines, all of which Brosnan
delivers in perfectly straight-faced fashion. One involves a nuclear
physicist named Christmas Jones (Denise Richards), who is apparently
only named Christmas Jones to aid in one hilarious bit of dialogue
during the film's closing moments. But Richards is one of the weak links
in this choppy adventure. I mean, she plays a nuclear physicist, for
cripes' sakes. Conveniently, she is the only scientist running around in
tight black shorts and an enticing green tanktop. While the actress (who
previously appeared in the risqu sex thriller `Wild Things') is
certainly fetching, perhaps her acting abilities aren't quite up to
snuff.
At one ludicrous point in the action, a younger viewer sitting behind me
had this sarcastic retort: `Yeah, right'. Boys and girls, Bond movies
are not about realistic action. They are unique thrill rides with daring
stunts and exhilarating chase scenes, often succeeding because they are
more wild and wacky than any other conventional action films. Stretching
the technological barrier, Bond has some nifty new gadgets here: x-ray
sunglasses, a credit card that transforms into a key... It's not to be
taken seriously, but it's fun.
Well, mainly. There is an element about these last two Bond entries (the
previous being `Tomorrow Never Dies') that drains certain excitement
from the premise. With this ingredient absent from the formula, `The
World is Not Enough' remains tasty, but ultimately it is lacking in a
few vital areas of humanity that were alive and evident in the classic
Connery films. For his next outing, James Bond could certainly use a
fresh canvas to explore something more different and exciting. `The
World is Not Enough' is entertaining, though, you've got to admit.
James Bond is certainly not dead. He simply needs some shock treatment.
Proud NEW OFCS Member --> Check out my NEW Site Look
